What are some of the benefits of drinking aloe vera juice? There are several and they are all far-reaching. In the following article we shall look through these benefits and give you a detailed explanation of the same.
Created to pretend we never die,
Now that we have a 6 month old baby we are starting to watch cartoons and kids shows again. It is interesting to see that a few shows from when we were little have survived the test of time. The classics such as Sesame Street, Scooby Doo and Thomas the Train are still on and are pretty close to being the same as 25 years ago.
I have great kids. They are good at so many things. I am so blessed.
- sentiment by Penny Black - called 'Friends Matter', stamped in Old Olive
A dear friend of mine recently had her second child. Last week I went over to her house (making it easy for her -- keeping her baby and toddler in their own setting), but I brought the lunch and I also brought her dinner for that night.
A bat! A tiny, soft, furry little bat sitting there in the middle of the day! What are you doing, Little Bat? It's the middle of the night! Or...well... you know what I mean.
“Don’t look so surprised,” he said. “You gave me permission to lurk.”
The Metropolitan Board of Works was founded in 1855 to manage London-wide issues and projects centrally. One of their projects was the purchase of 63 acres for a community park, which eventually became Southwark Park.
I waited a couple of days after I talked to them to do it, and it was totally worth it. First, I made sure to get a fashionable hat to hide my face. Hats aren't that popular here though. I guess when you stay away from the sun all day you don't need a hat. So it's really more like a fashionable brim across your face. You're supposed to style your hair over it. I did something “simple”, and by simple I mean something that took merely an hour and a half. Women here have way too much time on their hands.
PART TWO:
More perverted
Jeremy’s struggles with his restaurant provide the main arc of the narrative in this complicated melange, and give Taylor a chance to poke some wicked, satirical fun at food culture, and trop haute cuisine, and also, to examine the delicate relationship between food, chef and the restaurant patron. High-concept pizza, high-end coffee, vertical food, in fact, a whole host of recognizably recent food fads are trotted out and dispatched with, in favour of a tradition-inspired regional cuisine. (In the unhappy event that Taylor should choose to abandon fiction-writing, there is a second brilliant career as a bilious restaurant critic waiting for him. His assessment of a piece of designer pizza, as a “commodified splatter of culinary incoherence on a shingle,” must certainly rank among the all-time great review put-downs.)
26 Sail on, Sailor
You still have to suspend your disbelief a little bit in some scenes and a lot in others, but if you can join this fantasy world, you will be held spellbound from beginning to end and walk out of the theatre hoping for more sequels.
Well, I myself feel like I am perpetually emerging! Every book is a new beginning.
My sister-in-law and future brother-in-law will taste these today so I look forward to their verdict…
There were a number of reasons why I took Steve on as a client, all part of a process which involved editorial discussion and meeting him face to face which is terribly important. The author/agent relationship is by its very nature quite an intimate one and one that involves a lot of trust. It is therefore fundamental that you both hit it off and share a common vision about what can be a long and hopefully fabulous journey from placing a book with an editor, through to its publication.
My belief is that if I eat that breakfast, I will gain weight. She says I won’t. So for one month (until my work conference) I am eating breakfast. We are not tracking weight because I know instinctively I will become competitive. Instead, she will track my measurements. For some reason, I don’t have the same attachment to or drive to reduce measurements as I do weight on the scale.
This is just a snapshot of what our days are like. She is getting really good at moving herself around (though not quite crawling yet) and playing by herself. She pulled that breakfast puzzle down all by herself and was having so much fun playing with it. She didn't even notice me watching her till I called her name.
Enforcing discipline has been one of the largest conundrums in my work here. If I mimick my own experience, I would be threatening my students with grades. But the threat of a zero is not really a threat if they are getting it in the first place. If I look at the prevalent Tanzanian culture, it's the use of a finger-thick tree branch. I have always been opposed to corporal punishment because I believed that those with bad behavior will continue to have bad behavior despite the pain, and that discipline from fear is a negative energy that I did not want to be associated with. Unfortunately, the motivational speeches and humorous public humiliations had reached their limits, and more and more students began to lose their focus.
Joy and sorrow
Now I'm veering even more wildly off topic to mention the karate instructor -- I'm going to call him Thor -- is Alex's new personal trainer. Al had to replace his first personal trainer because First Trainer used to come to our apartment and ask, "So what are we going to do today?" He would then reluctantly agree to Alex's plan and go running in the Luxembourg where Al would run circles around him. Sometimes Alex couldn't even see First Trainer because he was so far behind. Nice guy, but perhaps not the most effective of trainers.
Oil - 1/4 tsp
Wow…let me try that again. Sip. Gulp…sllluuuuurp.
Today I would like to tell you all about Vanessa Adao from A Casa da Va! Six months ago, Vanessa went back to Brazil (where she was born) and devoted that time to focus on textile design.
In very recent years we’ve seen the advent of such terminologies and fields of endeavor as nondual psychotherapy, nondual Judaism, nondual Christianity, nondual science, nondual spirituality, nondual inquiry, nondual awareness, nondual philosophy, nondual comedy, nondual cartoons, nondual knowledge, nondual wisdom, nondual healing, nondual teachers, nondual tantra, nondual presence, nondual pointing, nondual perspective, nondual contemplation, nondual coaching, nondual counseling, nondual parenting, nondual design, nondual brain, nondual retreats, nondual Yoga, nondual ecology, and I’ve even seen nondual Tweeting.
spring forth fountains of red blood.
So I guess it makes sense when people say, "The government sucks."
One of the reasons why whisky sales have being falling for the last decade is possibly because a highball (and the similar mizuwari, see below) does not have anything like the same function as a single malt. It is a clumsy way to put it but what I mean by "function" is the role a drink has in an evening: whether it is a easy starter drink, a post prandial sip, a chaser etc..
1. This Charming Man (Smiths)
The United boss at yesterday’s press conference, urged his team to, “wake up” ahead of their first meeting between the two sides since 1957. When they recorded 6-5 win on aggregate in the European Champion Club’s Cup.
Aging sucks because I leave half of my teeth in a glass at night. And, I swear, it takes me less time to complete the New York Times Sunday crossword puzzle than it does to get my two partial plates and what remains of my natural teeth brushed. By the time my pearly whites are shining and in place, it’s mealtime again.
Last year the wooden rocking chair we got from freecycle also suffered an injury, from the kids who loved it, perhaps a little too much, and again I kept the parts thinking I could fix it, but as it turns out it would have cost a fair bit to sort it out, so the the bits stayed in my shed.
Today we get up and decide to have a look around Huanchaco. We walk straight to the beach. This town is a surfers paradise and we can see why. There are some big waves here. We walk along the waterfront and decide to have a really early lunch since we haven’t had any breakfast. We get a set menu for 10 soles of salad, lamb saltado and a drink of inca kola. The saltado comes out and it is the worst saltado we have been given. I eat the fries and red onions only! As we leave this restaurant it is then lunch. We continue on our walk along the beach and come up to the pier. We pay the 50 centisoles (25 cents NZ) and go on. A lot of the locals fish off this pier and we see many of them walking back with their plastic bags full of fish. After the pier we then continue along the beach. We come up to the reed boats that are still used by the locals for fishing. These boats are used in a similar way to a surf board. The rider sits on the boat and their legs dangle on either side. They tend paddle themselves out with a stick. We get to the end of the beach and decide to head to the ruins which are near by. We walk back along the street to catch the bus and i see four people across the road waving at me. “Do i know these people?” I decide to wave back and then i realise who they are. They are the Swiss guys that we met in Bolivar! We walk over and have a chat to them for a while. Afterwards we then flag down a bus to Chan Chan. The bus is completely full of school aged children from the ages of 6 – 9. We jump on and this cute little girl stands out of her seat and offers it to Rico. Of course Rico doesn’t take it and tells her to sit back down. This bus is very packed that we have to hold on to the ceiling to stop from toppling over. Me and Rico must look so funny standing in this crowded bus full of school kids. After five minutes the driver tells us that we are in Chan Chan. We jump off and there is lady sitting there. She tells us that we have to walk 2km down the drive way to the Chan Chan ruins. She also gives us some history and tells us that 300,000 people lived at this site and the ruins covered 30 km. We then head up the drive way. This town is very hot, so this isn’t the easiest walk. When we get to the entrance we find that the same lady we were talking to at the end is there. She tells us that she drove up, which means she drove straight pass us and didn’t offer us a ride! We wouldn’t have taken one anyway. We buy our entrance ticket which is 10 soles (5) and this will also get us entry into the museum and two other archaeological sites. We then head into Chan Chan. This city was surrounded by a large high wall. We walk in and see that this city is huge! I can see how 300,000 people lived here. The ruins are no where near as good as Machu Picchu, but they are good in their own respect. We see the huge plaza which was used for ceremonial purposes. We see the lagoon they made to grow crops. We see where the residents would have lived. What i did like about this place is the decorations on the walls. They had pictures of fish and birds on them, it looks really good. After this we catch the bus back to Huancaco. We then go to the mini-market and buy a Trujillo beer each and an ice cream. We then walk back to the hostel and play some card games and drink the beer while it is still sunny. Once the sun goes down we head back to the beach for dinner. We go to a restaurant and order the set menu. The set menu includes Ceviche which is fish marinated in lemon juice. Since Rico doesn’t like fish we ask for an alternative to ceviche. The guy tells us we can have soup. So we agree to the soup and we both get the lamb saltado for our main. This is basically exactly what we had for lunch. Our soup comes out and Rico tries it and exclaims “very flavoursome”. I try it and it is really nice. We are both eating our soup and Rico eats a piece of the meat in the soup and says “oh its fish soup, i don’t like it”. I still thought it was really nice and i ate all of it. Our lamb saltado comes out and i try it hoping that it is good and it is. I eat all of this and im very grateful that it wasn’t like the one i had earlier in the day! After our dinner we then walk back to the hostel and do some reading of our lonely planet for our next destination and then head to bed.
I’ve been using Nike + GPS since mid-September last year and I passed 300km after my run on Tuesday. The first I knew of it, though was this lovely message from the website (above). Even though I know these things are automated, I have to tell you, it made me quite chuffed that someone, somewhere thought this achievement worthy of noting and celebrating.
During December Dotito had some other places in which he had cultivated green maize which was well ripened. Derere sent his people to buy that green maize with their hoes and axes. Then he had to share the green maize with his people.
Had I known what it would take to parent a child with Sensory Integration Disorder, then I would have said that I didn’t have what it took. And I probably would have been right. My stress level has been straight through the roof ever since I had Jeremy but in reality finding out that he had something that was positively diagnosed gave me the power back! I knew that if I educated myself, our situation would improve and positively it has.
Today is the day that Londoners vote on who we want to be Mayor; in previous Mayoral elections I’ve had a horse in the race, but this time Ken Livingston has been unable to keep his more odious opinions to himself and Boris Johnson continues to be a self-serving lizard creature, and I’m left with the option of either voting for that nice independent lady, or defacing my ballot paper (Paddick lost my vote when he wormily failed to give an opinion on whether or not Johnson did the right thing in withdrawing the “ex-gay” bus ads; Brian, you of all people I would expect to put your back behind the gay community).
Another quick post from me today to show this card I've made with one of my new Magnolia Tilda with Rubber Boots. She's been coloured with Copics and a sprinkling of Glamour Dust. Papers, well I'm not sure if they are Anna Griffin or K & Co?????? Flowers, ribbon and Pearls from Wild Orchid Crafts, sentiment is Stampin Up.
The public perception is that we are all criminals who make millions of dollars by ripping off little old ladies – it’s not true! The profit on a car is a very small percentage. We have some room to negotiate, but not a lot.
Karen x
"It's not a very interesting name and it's a beautiful planet," Vogt said. Unofficially, he's named it after his wife: "I call it Zarmina's World."
"Er Ted?" Rob says, "Why have you given me one of these I leave in less than two weeks."
You know what? I'm just freakin' miserable. I really just want to go home. I usually love to travel, even for work, but this is going to be a tough week and I don't leave until Sunday.
On to week two…here we go!
“Love ya!” I proclaim to my coworker who helped me reach an important deadline.
Disclaimer: I am in no way saying that these books are literary gems, actually far from it. They are just fun being unintentionally funny.
People are usually happy with the concept of a painting telling a story that can be interrupted in a number of ways and accept that a quick glance isn’t enough – you have to stand in front of it for a while whilst you personalise the meaning. So why then do we struggle when a novel works in the same way, when the writer uses words to paint images directly into a reader’s head to tell a story in a way that needs time to sit within their mind?
Monty never wanted to be sober in the first place. He was only attending AA meetings with his fiance (who he meets at AA) because she forces him to go. From page 1 he doesn’t really care about being sober. He gives a speech early in the book where he himself even admits he had great parents, a great family, education, job, no drama, no heartache and no seriously devastating life event. He liked drinking so he kept drinking. That’s it. He punched his mom in the face, he called her names, and, aside from a brief hint that perhaps he regretted it, he didn’t really seem to care that it happened.
I used Sandra's fantastic back tutorial which you can find over on her blog Cherry Heart Cushion Back Tutorial. Her tutorial is fantastic and is in two parts. My cushion is not perfect, but that is ok, I am just a novice after all.
As a reminder, we have just posted a Flashback Friday Challenge and you have '2 weeks' to complete the challenge. All entries should be uploaded by midnight PST on Friday, August 12th. Good luck to you all, I can't wait to see the entries for this fun challenge.
Matthau was fine as the grumpy Vandergelder; I do think plenty of other people could have played the part equally as well, or possibly even better, but nonetheless Matthau’s portrayal really made me smile.
Welcome to our wedding planning blog! We started this blog as a way to capture all the things we liked and to easily share our ideas with friends and family. We’re so happy you found us and are joining us in our wedding planning adventure!
Then he who is physically uncircumcised but keeps the law will condemn you who have the written code and circumcision but break the law. For no one is a Jew who is merely one outwardly, nor is circumcision outward and physical. But a Jew is one inwardly, and circumcision is a matter of the heart, by the Spirit, not by the letter. His praise is not from man but from God. (Romans 2:27-29)
there is no kindness compares to silence.
Elemental: Undines (water-based nymphs)
A friend of mine asked if I had a particularly difficult childhood. I didn’t. I had a good one, fortunately. I may, however, have overdone the juice when I came up with this idea.
8:30am to 12:30pm
They have used earthquake and weather weapons to punish countries who denied them access. This includes the Christchurch quake in New Zealand after the cabal was denied use of their lush, southernmost mega-island.
I got another job, one in which I earned better money and gained more
"All religions, all this singing,
Isaac dropped our milk carton and broke it. It was therefore already on "thin ice." I pulled the carton out of the fridge, forgetting about this, and it broke open again, spilling milk all over the fridge."Dang it," I said before I thought about it. (This is the one word that I continue to use without thinking, and I've been working on cutting it out of my vocabulary.) And then, as I cleaned up the milk, I said, "I'm sorry boys. Mommy shouldn't use that word."
Keep track of a customer’s buying habits, and make use of those results. Personalize your messages with a customer dependant on their actual habits and you may realize that people are more considering your organization. When you make time to generate a person feel important, they will become return customers much more easily.
Before EBDs teams used a coved section of floor to pickup and accelerate some airflow from above the floor into the critical area between the diffuser and rear tyre. I predict we will see these shapes and similar devices to be used to keep the diffuser sealed at the sides.
Now, I don't know about y'all, but sometimes I am not the nicest person in the world and take just the tiniest bit of delight in picking on people who seem to be, dare I say, asking for it. I have little patience with wackos, having known enough of them in my lifetime that I just generally just want to avoid having to be anywhere around them. But sometimes--like when you're feeling grouchy and anti-social and just-leave-me-the-hell-alone-ish--it's just perfect when something like this presents itself to you. Fanatics of any stripe--political, religious, fanboys--it doesn't matter. When they get to the point where they're glomming onto people on the sidewalk and drawing little mustaches on posters of famous people, they're fair game. So of course I had to go out and see what they were doing. Right? Just a curious passerby!
FarmSlut lost her virginity either close to, or closely after her 15th birthday. She told me that she had slept with two guys already (and I don’t think many 16 year old girls lied about their number in 2004), and I knew she wanted to do it with me. Believe it or not, I was the one putting it off–something that was also influenced by her having sex with her ex that summer. Another story for (maybe, but doubt it) another time.
As usual, Hanno and I did our own thing. I had packed a small plastic box full of coffee mugs, a sharp knife, butter knives, forks, spoons, salt and pepper, tea, plates and bowls to take with us. We generally had the breakfast offer in the hotel or motel, but we also took a small package of Weetbix with us, and some milk, in case the breakfast didn't suit us or we had to leave early. Most nights we went to the local Woolworths, bought half a roast chicken and some salads and that was our dinner. It was much easier than finding a restaurant that served reasonably priced good food and we both enjoyed our little chicken picnics.
Somehow, I never imagined my future-heroic-feminist-self making her own curtains. But that’s what I’ve been doing instead of writing blog posts—teaching myself how to make curtains. I’ve even considered floral curtains.
-bold and
How was I to know to say goodbye?
Having a flat organization structure where information flows freely (as opposed to a pyramid structure which calls for more time for ‘informed’ decision making) cuts down on unneeded bureaucracy and red tapism to ensure rapid iteration of tasks getting completed on time/ before time. An environment where people feel free to discuss ideas and speak up is also one where the ‘rare’ someone who sees the oblivious pitfall helps bring that point into consideration when planning and executing a project.
I think, though, what has made the biggest difference for Jackson is working to make our school time more focused. Instead of making daily lesson plans for Jackson, I put all of his school activities in plastic drawers according to subject matter. I made a list of daily activities that we do together and placed it in his "meeting book" in a page protector. As we complete one task, I mark it off with a dry erase marker. Caedmon joins us on much of the work that is oral and has learned much himself. I don't necessarily follow the order that I typed things up, but we are getting much more done just by having this one checklist handy. This saves me much frustration and even though I am not making out daily lesson plans we are seeing great progress. I thought I would share my list with some explanations for you today.
I don't have many shots showing the process, mainly because I was in such a tight time-crunch and sleeping so little that stopping to take documentary photos seemed like an unaffordable luxury.
i’m sorry, but how true is this?? i can’t be the only one (well, me and the author of this picture) that cracks myself up, can i?
Can't (Can tribute band)
Most children's/YA writers are not actually children or young adults. Do you have any tips/tricks for staying in touch with what's cool or relevant to kids, or do you think it's enough to remember what it was like to be 8, 12 or 16?
What happened was this: A large female guest, watching the show from the ringside, fainted when one of the clowns accidentally fell on her during his act. Boobenstrausser, who was also in the audience, took immediate command of the situation and revived the woman with some smelling salts in his possession. He then convinced her that she had suffered no lasting damage, and should not blame the clown for a harmless prank which had brought everyone much pleasure. After the show, we gratefully offered him the vacant position of circus doctor, which he accepted on the spot.
recently, i've found myself avoiding the news, the weekly newsmagazines that tumble through the mail slot of my door demanding my attention and letting the worlds woes stack up at the door. this seems to rapidly becoming a theme here and i'm not sure why. i regularly hear about corruption around the world, first hand accounts of it...the blind eye being turned when people openly demand a "little tea money" and those who try to do the right thing by not ading to the corruption be underminded, denied work or worse, have their work degraded, payments delayed, and their ethics criticized...and this is everywhere on some level or another...i read migrant tales and his observations on argentina...i hope that education is the key, but even that is generations in the making to change a systemic problem. saying no mas, stop, enough is becoming increasingly more dangerous, personally and professionally. to change will be complicated, but the effects profound...that is, if we as a species survive...
Brad Pitt, Moneyball
I stamped my images in VersaFine Onyx Black ink on Strathmore watercolor paper and then used reinkers and a watercolor brush to color them in. I cut out with my Grand Calibur and Grand Ovals Nestabilities. My background is the Polished Stone Technique. I have a tutorial here. I wanted it to look like chicken feed! The sentiment is a Heidi Grace sticker that says "sunny."
Both of this stories are such beautiful examples of how it is NEVER TOO LATE to change your life. It is never too late to get healthy. It is never too late to chase after your dreams. It is never too late to try something new. It is never too late to find a new talent. It is never too late to find new greatness in yourself.
Real flesh to cling to at night?
Happy New Year! After a much needed vacation, I'm back on blog.
It may seem unfair that an innovative, distinctive and ubiquitous toy shape (it was estimated that there were 62 Lego bricks for every one of the world's 6 billion inhabitants) cannot be protected. However, Lego had previously enjoyed patent protection for the brick shape.
Sure it will be a way to “get our guys home” and return them from being housed at a prison in Colorado but that is only a temporary solution. GCCF is only one facility of five that were slated to be built in Alaska so that means that an ever present overcrowding problem will continue.
EV4 - The Plague - Out With Me All Night / Er? / I Don't Want To Be Like Jimmy (April 1980)
If you’re reading this you’re probably in the class with me and as such already know all about the assignment but, on the off chance that you’re someone new, I’ll give a brief explanation of the theme before discussing how I went about gathering these images.
The only other thing to do apparently is spray with some organic-acceptable stuff before the season begins, if you expect it to be a problem. Once it starts, there’s really nothing you can do that season. And both of my trees are almost completely defoliated at this point.
An example is this comment taken from a LibDemVoice article:
Genre: Contemporary, Suspense/Mystery
A few days ago the spud says: Uncle Leif, wanna hear a joke?
They also feature personal favorite Audre Lorde who is a damn fine sociologist. She "pioneered the concept that racism, sexism and homophobia were linked in that they stemmed from people’s inability to recognize or tolerate difference." (from the write up on Autostraddle)
It hasn't all been bad though, it very rarely is! Life has carried on around me and my tooth trouble. We had a visit already planned from the children's Godfather (and long term friend of mine) He arrived on Wednesday last week, in the midst of my misery, and took the children off my hands for a few days. They had a marvellous time riding bikes together, walking up the footpath, playing many energetic games of tag etc in the garden, and generally enjoying the sunshine. I was eternally grateful for this entertainment source, even if I felt less able to relax with someone staying in my house. (You know how it is!)
So where do we begin to fix the problem? How do you convince Americans they don’t need that new HD-TV, or that their kid doesn’t need another video game? We can start with ourselves, we can try to limit our own spending and use our time and money to serve the poor and the oppressed. In the words of Gandhi, you must be the change you want to see in the world.
And the confidential nature of counseling is a godsend to someone in a leadership position who knows that, for their own health, they shouldn’t isolate themselves but who doesn’t know of anyone in the company that they would feel safe confiding in.
As of now, the only 4 things on the birth plan I know I’m responsible for, which are already etched in stone are:
anyway? Shrimp and steak or lobster bisque? Macaroni and cheese? How can you
Free State Brewing Co. Old Stormy
Less condoms, more trust. (note from the blogger: very, very questionable)
I'm starting to wash all of Jaxon's clothes and bedding today. I was going to try to have pictures up of his nursery by this blog post, but I don't think that'll happen. I guess you all will have to wait until my next update. Sorry!
One may have read the Spirit of Prophecy Bulletin for today. One may have been encouraged. Thank You Jesus!
In the world's broad field of battle,
Personally, I am bit disheartened because I had dreamed of using the Kindle platform to purchase book after book at that magic price of $9.99. Those dreams have been shattered. Standing back however from my disappointment, this apparently steady increase in the price of e-books is a fascinating example of a nascent industry seeking to find a workable pricing model.
Anyway... back to the coconut patties. These bad boys are cavity-inducing, chocolate-covered sugar bombs.
confession 2: I really, really cannot wait to watch the hobbit. I know most of you are dying to watch the hunger games (enter confession 3), but I am over-the-moon-type-excited about the hobbit.
I though conference was awesome. I haven’t watched the 2nd session from Saturday yet but I am going to. It was very interesting how there was a lot of focus on family and getting married and doing what you can to start and be a strong family.
“Mizzuss Carter, what are we supposed to do with this great big book? The one that won’t fit under our desk?” Gladys asked still hopping up in down in her chair.
I have had so many great opportunities to take pictures of families this fall, and the biggest obstacle has been juggling all the balls of life. I found that I committed myself to too many sit-down-at-a-desk kind of jobs, for a Mommy of a 4-year old at home and a 7-year old. I found that I miss having an office to go work in. I found that I miss having co-workers. I found lots of ways to fill my schedule, between volunteering, photography, and running Mommy School. Said my sister, "You are the busiest unemployed person I know!" I found that I love, love, love doing this. But I know that this isn't something I can sustain for the long term, not as it currently is.
I think it's time I got my skates on with my Christmas gift making while there's still a fairly decent amount of daylight left. I was mooching around what I call the naughty aisle ( biscuits and sweets ) in Tesco and came across these tins of cookies.
4-5 oz soft goat cheese, sliced or crumbled
So Nick’s Aunt is sick and dying, and comes to tell Nick about his family heritage, bringing a whole arsenal of knowledge and family weapons in a trailer for him. As soon as she does die, Nick dives headlong into the world of the Wesen, which is what they call the Supernatural crowd here in Oregon. Matter of fact, they have different names for all the Supes in these parts, and there are a lot of them – werewolves, ratkin, lizardmen, avians and many more, all get unpronounceable names like Hesslichen that Grimm nevertheless adheres to faithfully. Nick does his best to juggle his girlfriend Juliette, who isn’t aware of his double life and it drives Nick insane to try and keep it that way; his partner at the station, Detective Griffin, who almost had his heart literally eaten by what I gather to be a witch-monster called a Hexen; and a police chief that we the audience know is involved in the Wessen world in one form or another, that Nick doesn’t know about. Yet. In somewhat later episodes, reformed Blutbad (Werewolf) Monroe ends up helping Nick, and is now starting to aid him in the cause of turning over Wesen to the Grimm side.
2g Salt
But this isn’t about her --- sorry Amy.
By this time I had been awarded almost ten patents and had close to forty scientific articles published. In addition, a discovery I had made was pushed into clinical development for HIV therapy, and so when accepting the position in Quebec my career had been on the rise.
All three have the same score
-Front space is a 450 sq./ft work studio with a gated double door entry, partitioned office and filtered light.
ПХАНГ и САНГ Soccer Dad’s Middle East Media Sampler The Middle East Media Sampler 3/7/2012: J-Street vs AIPAC Lebanese Apartheid Week (poster) Реинкарнация Антихриста. Блокбастер исламского мира Tomorrow I will be posting a vlog about women in the #IDF. Stay tuned! #InternationalWomensDay #IDF @Chriscarroll50 thanks!!! Will the Palestinians Launch a Third “Intifadah” War on Israel? Barry Rubin: Will the Palestinians Launch a Third “Intifada” War on Israel? Oh joy…. Ystrdy 3307 tons of good&gas (including 156 tons of soft-drinks) entered #Gaza from #Israel via Kerem Shalom crossing Hamas denies report; says it would hit Israel if Iran is attacked
Bring the boys out (yeah you know)
So, I once again have an event to lose weight for. Sort of, at least. The plan is to take a massive road trip at some point this summer with stops in Tennessee, Wisconsin and New York, as well as wherever else I find intriguing. It’s been far too long since I’ve traveled without purpose and my gypsy roots are calling. That being said, I want to look decent for all the folks I meet on (what I’m calling) My Journey to Wherever.
and see the same look I see in August without justification.
The next day, we came home to find DD#1 tore up. Her whole head looked like it had been chewed on. Her ear was bleeding and there was a chunk missing from her nose.
CSN has been great to me all year sponsering lots of giveaways for those who follow along and products for me to sample from time to time and so when it came time to fill stockings and put gifts under my tree I shopped in my pj's on CSN.
Alive Inside is a documentary that explores the therapeutic effects of music on the elderly. The star of this particular clip is 92-year-old Henry. Resident at a nursing home for 10 years, he suffers from the degenerative disease Dementia. When he’s given a set of headphones plugged into an iPod full of tracks from his youth, Henry undergoes a transformation that is to be seen rather than told…
I took my bike into the bike shop to get a tune up, and the owner asked when the last time I'd ridden it was.
Do you have a system for keeping your important family documents under wraps?
What do I want to write about? What has been weighing on my heart and mind recently. I start to write, then see that I have a new message in my inbox, so I go check it. Then I remember I needed to check my editorial calendar to see what else I need to get written and for whom. Ooh, another email, this time telling me about a great sale on fabric. I need some new skirts, something that fits me and will keep me cool and looking chic in this unrelenting hot weather. I click the link, go drool over fabric, then come back to write more.
Much of the political Left is simply engaged in outing their opponents as evil, instead of rationally arguing against their ideas. Attaching labels such as “racist” or even “Fascist” to anyone criticizing massive immigration or Multiculturalism has become so common that Norwegian anti-Islamists have coined a new word for it: “Hitling,” which could be roughly translated to English as “to make like Hitler.” The logic behind “hitling” is a bit like this: “You have a beard. Adolf Hitler had facial hair, too, so you must be like Hitler. Adolf Hitler liked dogs. You have pets, too, you must be like Hitler. Adolf Hitler was a vegetarian. You like carrots, you are just like Hitler.”
5 complex
But the capture of their suspects broke wide open a case in which a Sandton woman was tortured with a hot iron during a house robbery last week.
South Africa’s drunk, sex pest, thieving, porn addicted and corrupt judges will not be suspended with full pay anymore
My Dad (tour guide) told us we were going to raise the flag over the Iow Jima Memorial. I was confused, but understood as we drove around the Memorial the flag slowly raises. Pretty cool. This memorial shows sacrifice to our nation from the soldiers willing to give all for the flag. Around the Memorial lists all the wars. With their dates. We have really been involved in a lot of wars! The really neat thing, our nation's land has been protected through all this. (The land of inheritance as long as we keep the commandments??)
dragon goes to Fire Island. I don't know, Frank. I just do NOT know.
Doesn't drink... Their liver is failing.
Here is my list -- in no particular order:
This version of events plays into the beliefs of millions of protestors who have called for Zimmerman to be charged with murder for shooting the teen and believe the killing was racially motivated.
Most Baptists are varying degrees of Calvinists, who adopt the “Perseverance of the Saints” tenet of John Calvin’s 5-point TULIP doctrine, which emphasizes the sovereignty of God over man’s choice in salvation. Scriptures that support this can be found in many books of the Bible. Here is a list if you are curious (go to the “Biblical Evidence” section). John Wesley, the founder of the Methodist Societies that would later become the present-day United Methodist Church was a follower of the teachings of Jacob Arminius, who presented a different view from Calvin’s, which emphasized not only personal faith, but also continuing faith in God that was revocable by the believer. This article explains the United Methodist view on “falling from grace.” Scriptures in 1 John 2:3-9, Galatians 1:6-9, Hebrews 6:4-8, Hebrews 10:19-31 can be interpreted that the believer is subject to falling out of good graces with the Creator.
In the openness of the heart we can work wonders for humanity. We become compassionate, we learn, we feel and we grow; we witness truth. We grow as we nurture this openness, just as the wheat grows tall toward the sun, so do each of us when properly warmed and watered. All can witness this pleasant virtue if he so chooses. To open the heart is to open a home, to open the arms; to let love shine on all creation.
Yes, web usage has grown. Yes, social media is an interesting and important social phenomenon. Yes, DVR's have become commonplace. But with all the new media and all the new technology no one expected TV viewership to behave as it has.
I know not what causes this fervent rush inside me…. Is it my heart surfing the Californian sunshine or is it my body bathed in sweetness that is Indian summer ?
I knew from the get-go that I wanted an original antique to use as the change table. Eventually I found a reasonably priced gorgeous old mid 1800's cedar chest of drawers on eBay. I adore the patina and proportions. We keep all the change-time paraphernalia in the top drawers so it's completely accessible when needed though otherwise kept neatly hidden away.
‘Sovereign Lord, as you have promised,
TL;DR - Bale. Crowe. Fonda. Foster. Six shooters. Chases. Shootouts. The Old West. What the hell more could you ask for? - 9/10
Now, I’m not saying that UF has chosen football over science. (Imagine the outcry, though, if UF cut a major sport instead of a major science department.) Actually, the real villains here are the Florida state legislators, who have cut the budget for their flagship university by 30% over the past 6 years.
Update 4/1 PM -- Some minor clarifications and extra detail added to the 3/31 summary below due to reading a technical scenario. My piecing-together aligned surprisingly well with the professional analysis.
so you can thank autumn for this giveaway!
Today I decided to use my PunchBunch "Ovoid" punch to create some different type tulips. The design paper I used is from the Pink Paislee "Spring Jubilee" paper pack. The butterfly is part of the design paper. The doily behind the tulips is the Cheery Lynn "Polynesian Sails Oval" (DL153). On top of that I used the new Spellbinders "Labels 25". A white silk bow was added to complete this card.
I love that we as Canadians can get this excellent content, and even more that most of it is available for free whenever you want to listen to it as a podcast. The CBC is part of my cultural identity... part of our cultural identity.
Happy Holidays everyone!!!
I am getting ready to go on holidays so this will likely be my last post for a while. I actually have a bunch of new cards made but I don't think that I will have time to photograph any of them before we leave.
Simple outline and doodling was all I added to this one, hope you like!
Roseanne Barr wants to play the liberal game of name calling when her issue is rejected by most of the population of the state. But who is she to call traditional marriage backers "bigots" when she took part in a mockery of one of the worst genocides known to mankind, the Holocaust, and dressed up as the genocidal bigot who oversaw this slaughter.
What rights do you have to want to put the kitten-tormenting guy into jail when you are basically committing the same crime... Killing animals, whether directly or indirectly? What, just because you are slightly guilty about eating your steak you are better than he is? Maybe he feels slightly guilty too!!
Damage to the U.S. isn't the only result of this managed effort. The peg actually threatens Chinese stability by extending a reliance on an unsustainable imbalance.
Kudos too to the Poetry Ireland crew, for their lowkey organisation and upfront hospitality.
Anyway, today I'll be showing you two awesome little polishes from Depend. My lovely friend Line in Denmark sent these two pretties to me and I adore them. I let Line surprise me with the colors and of course she did a wicked job because she and I have very similar taste!
One such brand is Tats and Tempest. Founded and designed by Marcus Tezcan, this is a brand that specialises in gorgeous leather technology accessories: think cases for ipads, laptops, and mobile phones. As soon as I checked out the website I fell slightly in love with a couple of the designs: on-trend enough to make you stand out, but subtle enough to match whatever else you're wearing. Here are some of my faves:
While I don’t fully understand exactly what’s going on in there, I’m very excited to learn. This is something completely new to both the genre and games themselves, who knows where this new approach could take us?
“I’m gonna go real slow.” Matt took off easy and Riley opened one eye seeing the pavement pass under her. We’re moving, we’re moving. I’m on a motorcycle and I haven’t died yet.
When a behavior or situation arises I want to get to the why. Acting out is always a symptom, but getting to the heart of the matter is more important than worrying about the behavior.
Jane Eyre (Charlotte Bronte)
Avatar: The Last Airbender - Definitely one of the best cartoons out there, if not one of the best shows period!
The ideal place might be Varanasi or Bodh Gaya, where undoubtedly there will be a great deal of chanting and appropriate pujas held. But as it's only 10 days away and I don't yet have the Indian visa, it might be near-impossible. July is boiling in those places; but for a once in a lifetime event, I suppose I could rough it. The Ganges at Varanasi will be absolutely swamped on such an occasion.
He went to the mall and got the absolute cutest outfits for her very first hospital pictures. The hospital also gave her a candy-cane striped stocking cap that was so tiny. It had a giant bow on it. We had that cap forever and it looked so warm and snug and she looked so cozy in it! She had a stunning head of absolutely beautiful dark brown-- almost black silky hair! Everyone was stunned by her hair! Her pediatrician said, she is absolutely the most beautiful baby he had ever seen, and he has seen a lot of babies!
The understanding I have of the love Frances had for Italy in Under The Tuscan Sun encompasses my love for London. Sure, there are a zillion things to do--and I've done a good 80% of them, but, my favorite thing is to sit on a park bench with a bag of scones and a cup of tea and just sit. I could sit for hours.
That is for the dramatists. For the mathematicians out there, you might decide to subdivide each beat into sixths, since, naturally, this is the lowest common denominator. And so you've again come up with a simple answer to a simple question...right?
Diamond literally told Vince Cable to f**k off to his face last week – small beer for this MoU these days, given he more or less said the same thing to a Parliamentary Committee of Enquiry last year, and to the Prime Minister in late 2010. On this issue, it is indeed to Downing Street that we should now look for a lead. There we will find two – one round Dave’s neck, and the other round Osborne’s – as Black Bob takes both his lapdogs for their Sunday constitutional up and down Whitehall.
remove medicine cabinet and replace with a builit-in niche
Under tower and balcony,
Soon I’m going to start marketing myself as a literary psychic. You tell me what you read for fun (no dissembling, please, I can sense if you’re lying, if you say “Tom Clancy” because you’re too embarrassed to say ”Nicholas Sparks”), and I tell you what that says about you.
I’ve spoken before about the way that United just know how to win, and I’m pretty confident that it will take more than a mind-game amateur to knock United off course.
Jorrie was allegedly at a science conference, that was the cover story and having his wife with him made it look perfectly innocent. What he was really doing however, was between him and very few others. The cover was that Armscor had told him they wanted him there to examine new technology, possibly for security applications. That’s what he told everyone, like Andre and I, before he left.
The Cosmsits conclude: “Please try to understand, we have already taken all your objections into consideration decades ago. As we want to make a favorable impression on the imminent Artilect, in a gesture of unmistakable generosity, we will use our latest replication technology to transform all Terrans- or Luddites, as some of you prefer to be called- into virtual cows, so that you may contentedly moo in the fields. As cows, you wouldn’t care what the rest of us are doing.”
“Romney has scaled back expenses, trimmed field staff in some cases and begun to count more on free media coverage to reach voters. And he's still relying on an allied super political action committee to supplement his spending on expensive TV ads.”
"It’s a whippet, he’s fast!"
I'm sure you disagree. So go write your own blog about what an idiot I am.
Hello there, thank you to everyone who sent birthday wishes for Jodie, she had a great day and appreciated all your good wishes.
A few alibis:
All paper is from DCWV. Ribbon is from The Paper Studio. The apple is from the Recess Cricut Cart. I didn't have a stamp for the sentiment, so I just printed on a small piece of paper.
Early Clinical Stage Products 16
Thanks again for stopping by and letting me share this fun idea with you over here at Ruffled Sunshine. And Thanks Jenn for having me!
So, today was the last day in the Ynystawe house. I’d got there at around 8:50am, knackered as they were due at 9 to collect it. I figured get rid of the sofa, drop off keys and paperwork at the letting agency, wander into town for Christmas shopping, some comics and a Subway.
The Arwells are surprised to be greeted by a madcap caretaker whose mysterious Christmas gift leads them into a magical wintry world. Here, Madge will learn how to be braver than she ever thought possible. And that wishes can come true…
Rejoice, O Mother Church, Exult in glory!
By monitoring the number of spotless days (days without sunspots) during a solar minimum, scientists can gain a sense of the intensity of the upcoming solar cycle. As of the end of December 2009, the cumulative number of spotless days in the transition into Solar Cycle 24 now stands at 771. The number of spotless days is beginning to tapper off. There were only 10 spotless days in December.
When the owners arrived home, they found Clarence still sitting on the man, who was now white as a sheet. After calling the police, the owners told the man that Clarence would not have eaten him. He didn’t have any teeth!
Add 1 cup of the milk and keep it simmering for next 10-12 min stirring it frequently else the milk will curdle. You can also a tbsp. of Besan ( gram flour ) to the milk to make sure it doesn’t curdle if it’s not fresh enough. Fresh milk wont curdle if is mixed properly at low flame and not at a boiling temperature.
Having been thus entertained we headed back to the cottage, wondering what impromptu entertainment may be put on for us in the days to come.
I am learning that mastitis in sheep can progress so quickly that you often don’t see any signs until it is too late. Prevention or early detection is the answer. (Do I sound like a health care ad?) I noticed a lopsided udder a couple of weeks ago. I caught the ewe and her lambs. It was obvious that the ewe was not letting the lambs nurse on one side. I found a scab at the top of the teat–maybe something that started from vigorous lambs with sharp teeth (nursing moms can relate to that too). I used an udder cream to help soften the scab and I milked her out. Fortunately the milk still looked good–not starting to get chunky or cheesy. I kept that ewe in for a few days, milking her some, but mainly making sure that she let the lambs nurse–which she did when I used the cream on her udder. She is fine now.
This is a work of art.
When you're alone in your bed
he took a hard look around
Extension means you will straighten an arm or leg.
Rick Santorum won:
and not just be some fools rushing to die in our sleep
this will prevent staining.
Lauren's writing style is a breath of fresh air, so clean and sastifying. Her words are like eating meat and potatoes, not only do they stick with you for a long time after the meal, but they are also very comforting, too. With something always going on, the pacing was perfect - no lulls in this tale. The story is told in third person, from different character perspectives. It is done, though, in such a special, moving narrative, the reader can't help but forge some kind of connection or emotional attachments to these quirky, lovable characters or at least a slight bitter taste in his/her mouth for the villainous ones.
All I did was find/make some clip art, print out my images, cut them to size and tape them onto some old jars I saved (from canning, peanuts, jelly etc...) Then put in tiny tea candles (or your could even use those little battery operated luminaries that are like 2 or 3 for a dollar at $ Tree). Now, enjoy your FREE luminaries. If you download the luminary printables, please, become a follower so you can be notified of future posts.
I was in a workshop discussing fiction that involved HIV, mania and depressants. I said something about how HIV is not transmitted by osmosis, and about the effects of depressants on individuals experiencing the high of a manic episode. The discussion got loud after very long and the instructor—as the intelligent moderator he is—said something like: let’s just leave it at that. I’m not a doctor and neither are
In many different places the New Testament gives us warnings. Romans 1 & 2 are quite clear. Jesus speaks often warning of the results of unbelief and un-repentence. My personal favorite warning comes from the Apostle Paul in Galatians 6. It says:
rows 5-7: Beg dc cluster, ch 1, *skip next two ch-1 spaces, (dc, ch 1) in next three spaces, (dc, ch 1) four times in next space, (dc, ch 1) in next three spaces, skip next two spaces, (dc cluster, ch 1) twice in next space. Repeat from * acrosss, dc cluster in last st.
It is because these kinds of ignorant comments that I decided to make a post, because even with all the talk about it, few people actually understand what Asperger’s really is. If I can make just make one person see that I am not just some “shy” kid or make one person understand a little bit more about Aspergers then that will be good enough for me.
“This is a case of innocence and the abuse of human rights,” Robert King said on the eve of the anniversary. King’s conviction was overturned and he was released in 2001, and he said he fears for his former fellow inmates now bearing in mind that they have spent more than a decade longer in solitary than he did.
“There is no justifiable excuse for it since Ms Tin had acknowledged the high concentration of elderly in the MacPherson ward, in her releases to the press,” he added.
After praying that God would make His will continually known through open or closed doors - these were FLYING open!
steadily
It’s time to stand on your own and discover who you truly are. Because everything is in you. Already. That is the revolution. That is the change. That is the answer.
Also testifies that the date stamps shown on Obama documents should not be in exact same place on various documents as they are hand stamped. Obama’s documents are all even, straight and exactly the same indicating they were NOT hand stamped by layered into the document by computer.
Thomas Jefferson said,
transcend pains to pleasures
Alive
Scally - and Vivienne 'denormalise alcohol' Nathanson who is also mentioned in the piece - are also on very thin ice if urging pension investors to object to how their money is spent. Because at least those investing have some semblance of choice.
Professor Miriam says Alexander the Great and Genghis Khan also met unicorns (no, it wasn’t me... I wouldn’t have anything to do with bloodthirsty men like those). And did you know that, in some translations of the Bible, the unicorn was the first beast to be named by Adam? Well, naturally Eve put him up to it.
How do you feel when you kiss a boy?
But thereafter the story gets complicated. The question is, pioneer for whom? As it turns out, pioneer essentially for forward caste Hindus among whom widow remarriage was virtually absent and was an ominous taboo. This was not the case with many backward castes and indigenous peoples of India among whom widow remarriage was nothing new. Then what does the valorization tell us in addition to Ishwar Chandra’s greatness? It is also tells about the near invisibility and irrelevance of the lives of much of India’s peoples in setting the content of public discourse of India, dominated by the higher castes.
I am sure by now you have come to realize that life on earth is all about submission. We are all under the authority of someone at all times. It is necessary to have an order to things if life is going to be productive. Within your home, your parents have the authority over you and your siblings. At school, teachers have authority over the class. In government, we have those in authority to help keep law and order in our land. There must be a method to the madness lest chaos reign.
107 Manic Street Preachers Roses In The Hospital (51 Funk Salute Mix)
Moms maybe today finds you beating up on yourself a bit, maybe you're giving yourself a hard time because you just can't do it all, or do it all anymore.
And I truly want to see this onboard green house of Y&S cruise ship. Read all about it at www.worldcruise-network.com and see if you will not feel the same ….
The English Football Press reminds me a lot about Vultures in Africa because all they do is to hover around teams and create stuff so that they sell a thing or two. Most times, they could be correct. Other times they could be the ‘c’ in crap. When the January transfer window loomed, they released all sorts of stories linking Arsenal to several defenders from the Milky Way because it was evident that Vermaelen’s absence meant that a dire replacement was needed at the back. They brought up tales about a beanpole defender that was happy in the city of Bremen drinking his German beer. They also brought up stories about a Bolton defender that would cost us a fortune if we were to acquire his services. They laud Cahill as if he’s some superstar sent from another dimension but I’ve not been too impressed by his exploits on the pitch. When we played Bolton, the best he did was to clear the ball off the line after Nasri had the second bite of his cherry. He was still part of the Bolton side that were sodomised by Stoke City in the FA Cup semis. The Vultures felt that linking us to Mertesacker and Cahill were not enough so they linked us to Blackburn’s handsome captain that can jump as high as a kangaroo. At least he has a 20/20 jumping attribute in Football Manager 2011. With the winter transfer window shutting close, they linked us to an ex-gunner that started his career with us and seems to be heading for npower Championship football next season. They said that he would be regarded as a short-term signing because he’s approaching his twilight years in West Ham.
City of Lost Souls (The Mortal Instruments #5)
Dr. Romeo’s entire practice and program are designed to help people feel better, look better, live longer and avoid, reverse or control those “diseases of age” that modern society has come to believe are inevitable in their senior years like heart disease, high blood pressure, high cholesterol, diabetes, arthritis, slowed thinking, impaired memory, hearing loss and some forms of cancer to name a few.
He also told the truth about Norway’s ‘Islam-blocks’ in Oslo. That is, blocks of ‘subsidised and low-cost’ housing especially created for Muslims. How on earth is multiculturalism served by creating subsidised Muslim ghettos? That’s the exact opposite of multiculturalism. It is, in fact, Muslim hegemony and supremacism - funded by the state itself. It’s a massive case of Leftist social engineering.
It doesn't seem like it was all that long ago when the elders of our nation were up in arms over Elvis. Preachers were telling us that his music, as well as all of rock and roll, was the Devil's music and that it would lead to fornication and eternal damnation.
Buenos Aires is an amazing city. There will always be a special place in my heart for Tina. Always.
Plus sometimes I come home with extra time, but I’m either too tired or feel like exploring more of 현리 (Hyeon-ri) instead of typing away. Anyway, by the time I felt like things were settling down I got sick. =( Eww. I know I promised my whole F4-residency report-alien registration card business last time but I will have to save it for later. And I promise! More is coming soon… I have lots to write about, especially now that I have a smartphone and am a bit more settled in school.
Hue Restaurant
Commodity – Expression
AND SCRAP EVERY SINGLE PHOTO!!!
Sharing information and inciting action
Garmin Forerunner 305 – I Found the Best Price On the Net
Hotel on the Corner of Bitter and Sweet by Jamie Ford is about love but about fitting in but what if you can't fit in. It's told through the eyes of a young Chinese boy living in San Francisco just after the Japanese Americans and immigrants were sent away to live in the internment camps. You get to hear how they were removed from their home. How they had to leave so many important things behind. How Japantown became a ghost city and how others took advantage of it.
Wool pencil skirt, vintage, thrifted ($6)
A few things I've been wanting to tell people and note for the future:
Recently a publisher rejected a collection of my short stories saying they liked the stories and thought I had a unique voice but my writing was “too literary” for their audience. I understand that books need to sell –publishers are running a business after all but I do think they need to broaden what’s available. There’s got to be readers interesting in reading fiction that’s a bit out of the ordinary that maybe challenges them a bit.
There's got to be people out there just as crazy as me, if not crazier.
Responsible for providing trend analysis to management team to enable them to make informed decisions regarding resource management
Hmmm my favorite Cricut cart! I would have to say as far as letters go “Cuttin’ Up” love the different fonts you get. Then my around cart would be all 41 of my carts. Because Cricut has so many themes and things to use. It’s hard for me to pick just one. I will pick one I just picked up online“A Child’s Year” I love the different silhouette of the kids.
I recently came across a blog entry where a Mom chose to do 35 random(ish) acts of kindness for her 35th birthday. Genius! So for my 28th birthday this year, I planned to do the same.
LARRY: Don't say it. Don't you fucking say "You're too good for me." I am, but don't say it. You're making the mistake of your life. You're leaving me because you believe that you don't deserve happiness, but you do, Anna. LARRY: Did you have a bath because you had sex with him? So you wouldn't smell of him. So you'd feel less guilty? LARRY: How do you feel? ANNA: Guilty. LARRY: Did you ever love me? ANNA: Yes. He starts crying. She embraces him.
At the same time I ache for them, I have a wonderful renewed appreciation of all that I have left.
Supports helping the poor, providing a social safety net and extending unemployment. NO
This set begins with "Miles Davis and Horns" and "Dig" from the early 50's. Much of this music is not exceptional, being rather run of the mill jazz. But these two albums do contain some compositions which begin to show how good the early Davis bands (and Davis) were. The overall sound and feel is of a musician looking for his own individual sound. The next album, "Collectors' Items" is a bit better with musicians like Sonny Rollins, Paul Chambers, and Philly Joe Jones playing on some of Davis' better early tracks. With "Blue Haze", "Walkin'", "Bags' Groove", and "The Modern Jazz Giants", Davis is starting to form his own sound and approach to jazz. This is perhaps the first time Davis sounds like the jazz giant he was to become-and is some of his best early playing.
Um Uerige is the only one I was familiar with, although the version I'd tried before was the Doppelsticke from Bierkompass, which is undoubtably one of the finest beers I've had. This is the standard version, which although still splendid doesn't quite have the same depth and complexity.
though possibly unpleasant,
Now onto this week's challenge which is....
Cheers, and thanks for reading!
If there is no will to cut back on the subsidies, then Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac becomes almost irrelevant since SOMEONE will deliver the subsidy. Shutting down Fannie Mae and Freddie Mac will simply shift the delivery to FHA.
1 rote
Measures a little over 10" tall. Each one different!
Though they may not agree with you always
I'd like to try it again next year, but need to find some better quality glass balls. These were cheap ones from Target and break very easily. I'd like to do this with a ball that is a bit thicker and less likely to break just by touching. If you have any thoughts on where I could find something like that for next year, leave me a note in the comments.
It turned out with really nice photos – I will give you a link when Tony put them up on the blog.
Helping raise the amount of money that FTK raised to assist families with children that have or had cancer is definitely a highlight within my college career. This experience, journey, and worthwhile venture was incredible, and I really enjoyed being part of such a great organization. It makes me feel good knowing that I am impacting the lives of others in such a positive way. The dancing within the organization brought me to FTK, the friends that I made kept me doing things for FTK, and the Kids I have met will forever keep me involved with FTK. Keep on dancing For The Kids!!!!
Seeing humanity at its best,
The town crier in his cowboy suit
It was such a nice weekend! Starting the weekend, we had pretty much no plans, but we kept busy the entire time.
To help make this a success, we're hoping you guys might be able to help out with promoting this event. If you feel so inclined to make a blog post, add our button your sidebar, tweet, facebook or share a link to this post, we would appreciate it so much! You can also increase your chances by helping as they will score you extra entries.
Here, I review the insights, experiences and occasional epiphanies I had along this journey.
Mādhava is a name for Kṛṣṇa highlighting his honey-like sweetness. He sincerely participated in these emotional scenes, although categorically different from all the others – being the source of the purity of the river in which the others sought purification.
Reality is that as humans we are strongly effected by the contradicting ideas of the false doctrine which is now in the LDS church. I have seen people who are literally insane.
The bits I'd saved. Poor Richard was in the know.
The Doctor, Jamie and Carstairs try to make their escape in a SIDRAT but the dematerialisation is stopped from outside by the War Chief, who activates the dimensional controls, forcing the inside of the ship to shrink, much like what the Doctor did to the Monk's TARDIS in The Time Meddler. The Doctor emerges from the ship, apparently defeated, but quickly uses a gas valve to deal with his enemies, restores the ship's dimensional interior, locks the controls and departs for the war zone. They cross back to the 1917 zone but are recaptured by Smythe, who decides to kill the Doctor regardless of what his War Lord superiors may want. The Doctor is saved from the firing squad at the last minute once more; this time by the resistance, and Russell kills Smythe. There is a certainly a fair amount of repetition in this story but this works to show the futility and repetitiveness of War.
It’s a small moment but incredibly powerful.
Note that it's a pdf document. The file name (Franklin-Madison_Agency_Agreement-signed-1.pdf) is consistent with the contract's heading. But see what happens when you access the File menu, and click the Document Properties link:
Her own expression flitted from surprise, to joy, to contrition. Almost as swiftly, I would imagine as my own transformation from a state of joy to one of anger.
I suppose it should be mildly encouraging that the House of Commons is to debate and vote on whether there should be a referendum concerning the UK's membership of the European Union. The BBC informs me (here) that what will be debated is whether a referendum should be held giving the great British public three choices: (i) remaining in the EU, (ii) withdrawing from the EU and (iii) staying in but renegotiating the terms "in order to create a new relationship based on trade and cooperation".
Occupy began on September 17 last year when protesters occupied Zuccotti park in Manhattan but were cleared out two months later.
In conclusion, API offers benefits for businesses and users to operate on a single 3rd party application by increasing data traffic and services within a dynamic web platform.
What about you, do you make samples of new techniques or just play around just to practice on?
When I am in camping mode, I can pretty much ditch all those luxury goods and services, except one SIMPLE thing.
BLOGGERS NOTE: ResearcherID.com is a web-based tool developed by Thomson Reuters which allows researchers to develop their own researcher profile. ResearcherID ties in with ISI, EndNoteWeb and cited references, if institutions subscribe to ISI Web of Science, may provide an alternate to local development of similar software or adopting an open source version. Community of Scholars is another subscription-based database that provides researcher profiles. See also Cornell’s VIVO at vivoweb.org. I also think that Faculty 1000 in Biology and other tools are allowing more researchers to develop and share personal profiles with publications. All told, there’s a perceived benefit in having more compete picture of our faculty research within our institutional repositories.
3.Put the egg whites in a large bowl and whisk until they form stiff peaks. Or use a food processor with a whisk attachment. Maybe wipe a little lemon juice on anything you're using for your egg whites with this to ensure no grease / fat inhibits your fluffy peaks! Now gradually whisk in half the caster sugar, whisk thoroughly.
I was president of a local union once. If elected governor, I will be the management: It is a drastic role-reversal.
I'm sure you are all familiar with the idea of feng shui (if not, take a quick 101 via the link). You may see it as superstitious oriental claptrappery, or New Age scammery--or on the other hand you may be someone who has had your house feng shuied by an expert for a shedload of cash.
To ruin the cornfields in destructive crowds.
Wanna know my secrets But no I’ll never tell
Craig Lee & Senator Pendleton
VARIATION: Use Strawberry Jay Robb protein powder, omit the mint and add strawberry extract. For the pink color, I added a tsp of natural food coloring. Click HERE to find.
Top: Dorothy Perkins; Skirt: Thakoon Addition; Shoes: Tory Burch; Bag: Chloe; Necklace: House of Harlow; Bracelets: Asos
“How far are you all going ?” Ruby asked us with a sigh
3. Birthday cake Oreos (aka the best invention on the planet!)
Reminds me of being back in High School, when love was fresh and new. Here is one of my favorite parts of these poems, tell me how much you can relate!:
Yesterday I was reading my friend Suzy’s blog … I was lured in by her email announcing that it was Friday afternoon and that she was knackered and had decided to make some changes. As it happened I couldn’t remember the last time I’d felt so tired myself, so I took a little break from work and read about her plans for an 8 day week.
And I'm thankful.
It's these types of storms that make me realize how fragile our daily work/life system is. We couldn't do banking we needed to do yesterday because even lots of the branches for our banks don't even have power. I had to wait for 45 mins to get gas yesterday in a line only to find out they have premium only available at a hefty price of course. I was so worried with less than a quarter tank of gas that I paid for that premium gas happily! With sun setting so early it hard to get anything done when I left work yesterday I got home and had a 1/2 hr of daylight left and then we had to do our night routine all in the dark with candles. The boys luckily got a bath at daycare yesterday when they had power for a bit but they even lost power yesterday so now they are working off a generator. I have Bo with me at work today to make it easier since I can mix bottles here easier and all that. Eli is ok at daycare and the bigger kids all play together so he was better off there then at my work. At least my daycare burns wood in the fireplace to heat the house and they have a generator they are running some things with.
I flew through the first few books in the series within a few days of starting the books; that's just how easy yet well-written they are. The language is simple (as if I myself were Jessica Darling writing the diary entries out), and, well, the story is one that many of us can relate to.
Rock star? What is rock star parking?
"Promises in the Dark" by Pat Benatar
booksandswearing@gmail.com
I downloaded an Author App. Basically I got the authors name on my iPad. When I touch it, it opens up into a pretty bookshelf where there is one book and samples of many others. When I open a sample, I can read inside the App and then if I want, I can tap the buy link and buy it on iTunes. How did I find the App? The Author App developer sent it to me when I was discussing the possibility of creating a Bob Mayer Factual Fiction book App.
Luckily, the best act by far appeared before the phone theft put the kibosh on proceedings. and that act was Janelle Monae, who had stormed it at Glastonbury a few days previously. Despite appearing at the distinctly un-funky time of 1pm (she was the first act on the bill, incredibly, below Chromeo and Katy B-- I predict she'll be headlining in 2013), Ms. Monae tore the roof off, as the youngsters of today would have it. Actually there wasn't a roof, just grey Hyde Park skies, but I gather this "roof" they speak of is only a metaphor anyway. And within five minutes she made you forget you were outside on a dull July day with a few hundred early-risers; instead you were transported into her black and white Wondaland. Seeing Janelle Monae live is like seeing Prince, Morris Day, Stevie Wonder, Cab Calloway, Trouble Funk (the extended, ellided 15-minute sets) or Little Richard at the height of their powers, and at various times she resembles all of these. I didn't really see many acts this year, but even if I'd been out every night, I don't think I'd have seen a better gig than this one. You can get a good idea of what I saw below:
after promising a lady at work
The wedding will be one of the biggest celebrations for the people of the UK for a long time to come, and it is no wonder that everyone there is getting excited about it!
South American Garlic Rice
Millrose - Men's Shot Put
You lose friends. You find new ones.
But thy eternal summer shall not fade
I also iced my knee because it was feeling a little sore.
08. Medusa
Since 9 March they have had 143 views. That averages out to about 50 days or 3 viewers per day. This blog averaged in those 50 days 15,000 page views and 5,500 unique visitors, averaging about 175 visitors a day.
Finally the secretary looked at Sally and said, "Fine. Is there a possibility I'll go over there and wind up in some kind of basement dungeon? Sure. But he's my soul mate."
It gets worse, though, when we get to the judgments being meted out by corporate "referees": "notes from a meeting in 2006 in which participants discussed problems with New Beginnings, mentioned concerns with ordering students who were younger than 18 to be dropped for attendance, ordering students to return to Mexico, the truancy court's lack of law enforcement authority and the fact that New Beginnings did not file cases with the justice of the peace courts but instead left that task to school districts." (emphasis added, and then some: Santa Madre de Dios!)
As in, fourteen more days until Christmas.
There was only one thing to do, double move, and watch as his glory slips out of his fingers. But oh no, Torrin would not go out with a whimper. He Heaved his great axe spinning through the air as an improvised thrown weapon. Everyone looked at him, and pointed out that the wizard had a realy high armour class, and that the paladin was only +1 with a ranged basic. He practically needed a critical hit to get him.
Tyler’s Thoughts – I feel that is shows like The X Factor, American Idol, or any show where you are suppose to be showing your talent whether it be singing, dancing, or any other talent…I feel that these types of shows should ALL be LIVE. From the beginning to the end of the show! If it’s a show it should be based on your live performance…There’s no good reason that the shows should be pre-recorded in advance!
A few days later our mail delivery person came to the door with a package from Elizabeth (her new blog is knittnkitten’s blog) with whom I was partnered in a tea swap held by Patty over at Artfully Ooglebloops. This was my first swap or Internet participation of any kind and I had been looking forward to it. So when I was handed an overly large package with some considerable weight to it, I was very curious and headed for the kitchen, grabbed a knife and started opening it without thinking that I would want to take a picture of the package first.
On his solid new album Fixin to Die, it sounds like G. Love has traded in his cold beverages for hot ones and wisely let the Avett Brothers mix up the special sauce.
Rob out!
· New coaching terminal at Naihati, the birth place of Rishi Bankim Chandra
I got got an extraordinarily short haircut on Saturday. Much shorter than what I'm used to. On the way home, I was looking at it in the rear view mirror and thought I looked a bit like a convict. I dismissed my critique and thought, who's going to pay any mind? Who's going to care?
2012 gets even better: with the Progressive NOSQL Tutorials. You’ve hopefully all heard of the Progressive .NET Tutorials — running since 2009 at Skills Matter — which bring you half day, hands-on tutorials. This year, NOSQL gets the Progressive Tutorials treatment: that is three days of keynote talks from NOSQL experts, each presenting a contemporary NOSQL use-case or technology, followed by afternoons of hands-on, practical NOSQL tutorials, on specific technology stacks, matching the morning talks.
so we spent a good hour on the phone discussing the differences between
Filled packed with empty people
Now this artist has died but he has passed his skills onto other wood carvers who now do his work.
The following pictures were taken at our corner gas station last Saturday. In Oregon you don’t pump your own gas, yes it’s a little silly, but wonderful too especially on a cold rainy night. As I waited for the tank to fill a small collection of plants against the window wall of the convenience store part of the station caught my eye. Normally I have a negative reaction to a rag tag collection of houseplants shoved up against a window, I find it rather depressing. Something about this group seemed different and I had to go investigate.
Before we move onto this weeks's challenge, I thought I'd write a little bit about each of the four weeks so far and tell you how I did, and how I feel like I'm still doing.
How do I do this? Part of it is having cool stuff. I have been blessed by the work of Jon Scieszka. His website, guysread.com, has supplied us with bookmarks, stickers, and posters. The great Tom Angleberger provided us with fake mustaches, Darth Paper tattoos, and a wonderful personalized sketch (which I then turned into a sticker). Vordak sent us some insult-generating cards. I’ve spent a few too many hours creating and perfecting a Guys Read membership card because…well…membership cards are cool. All of these things go straight to the guys. Because reading is fun, and results in fun stuff.
“It's different now. We kept our promises, we denied each other but we're free now.”
"On 12 December 2011, Portuguese Law 62/2011 was finally published. Approved by Parliament without any vote against (the leading opposition MP group abstained in the final vote), the law clarifies that an industrial property right cannot be infringed by acts that grant Market Authorisations (MA), establish Recommended Sale Prices (RSP) or Reimbursement values. It also creates a system for settlement of disputes relating to industrial property rights when reference medicines and generic medicines are at issue.
but I did want to share a pic of the top itself...
I’ve waded through the Greenwich Masterplans. These are planning documents for four areas of the borough – Charlton Riverside, Peninsula West, Woolwich Town Centre and Eltham Town Centre. They are currently open for consultation until 9am on Friday 9th March, so have your say. http://greenwich.limehouse.co.uk/portal/planning_policy/masterplans/
The sun is very present here, the sun and the wind, with me. Always.
Buying names on labels rather than the wine in the bottle can often lead to real disappointment and a sense of let down unless you fork out for a good example of a particular classic wine.
“In the House of Commons tearoom,” she says conspiratorially, “we sit by party because you can’t have the Opposition hearing your plots and secrets.” Surely, one day, she will write a Westminster bonkbuster to sit alongside her previous works? Whether it would figure a courageous Tory taking on the political establishment – or whether anyone would Tweet – is an open question. But there seems little doubt of the attention it would garner. I even suggest a title – Hung Parliament – and she howls with laughter. But she is not quite willing to commit.
Yeah, every pill corresponds to an emotional response. and you know, people seem to have, uh, a lot of them, emotional responses. So I carry a lot of these with me, and while my emotional response reaction time might be a little, uh, behind, I can... you know, respond with the best of them. Eventually.
like the intoxicating scent and the hypnotic spiral center…
(Originally Published on eGullet.com, July 4, 2004)
Now that I’ve been going twice a week for two weeks now, I feel like I have the right to speak on this now.
Okay, gimme your questions!
Activists have called on Home Minister Gamawan Fauzi to replace Syamsul due to his apparent incompetence and failure to schedule elections.
#1 What is your favorite drink of all time? Does it hold a special memory to you or is it just because it tastes good?
My sister babysat so that we could go to dinner with friends. It's been forever since we've had a dinner out without the kids, and it was really nice. We went for Turkish food and hung out for a couple of hours at a restaurant that we hadn't been to before. It was reasonably priced, and the food was excellent. The other couple have a toddler the same age as Miss M (they play together a lot), so we spent a lot of time swapping stories about the kids. I was thinking about it later, and was thinking that it is weird that I don't usually talk so much about my kids when I'm out with other friends. It took me a while to realize that this is because most of my other friends either don't have kids, or have kids who are much older and in developmentally different places. We spent a lot of time talking about the kids that night because we are both in the same place, dealing with the same stuff. It made me think about how much different our relationships with our friends at home would have been if we'd been having kids when they were having kids. It was kind of nice to be hanging out with people who are going through the same stuff. It's something I never realized we miss out on by being "older" parents. Guess we'll just have to get more young friends (or find some other geriatric new parents!).
And of course if anyone from Mulberry fancies sending me of their delicate rose gold babies I would look after it so!
I used to really hate running. But I’m enjoying it now, I’ve even made playlists depending on what distance I’m going to be doing! Today, since I have to run 2 miles, It’s my workout-2 playlist. Yeah go on then, I’ll tell you what songs they are, but no making fun!
Let me know your feedbacks on these and/or about your experiments and variations with lassi flavors.
It cost a little more also because I took it to the local Audi dealership (York Audi) instead of going to a non-affiliated garage where I know the rates would be lower hence cheaper servicing/repair. But, I don't mind paying a premium for the peace-of-mind (knowing the parts are official Audi ones as are the instruments/tools used to carry out the work) and the very good service I recieved. So no complaints. Yet.
And he called it “Chops”
“I thought it would take me about six months. In fact it took me 4.5 years and I built 5,127 prototypes until I got it right. That sounds tedious. In fact it was absolutely fascinating. I mean each failure, the 5,126 failures taught me so much. Successes teach you nothing. Failures teach you everything. Making mistakes is the most important thing you can do.” – James Dyson
Well what a day I've had with this puppy. Whilst my daughter sat in her bedroom, right next door to the bathroom, and her door was open, Ollie helped himself to the toilet roll and ripped it to shreds on the landing floor. Apparently she didn't see or hear him. Then whilst my Son was sitting in the lounge my sister popped an envelope through the door with some money in it and when I first came down the stairs I thought the trail of toilet paper had also gone down the stairs, but nope, he'd eaten the Queen's head on the £20 note!!! The silver bit is still in it and the serial no. so hopefully I cellotape what I have and well the missing inch is in his tummy. Teenages huh, aren't they just great, too much trouble for them to look after him for 5 minutes. Grrrrrr.
Visit us again soon to see our amazing new soft fruit area!
Last night on the radio they actually said while talking about this writer as if it is an actual person who had a birthday that they now know even more about this writer.
Goo: (laughing) There is no hope. We are on our own..We just happened that is all. No Eden, no Garden, no tree, no talking snake, no nothing. No promise of a Redeemer! There was a big bang one instant in a far off time. Darkness was all there was. Blackness and emptiness and nothing could be seen or heard or known. It was simply an empty chaotic void. It was nothing! Then out of the darkness suddenly for no apparent reason at all there was a big bang. I almighty Goo emerged from that big bang to create over billions of years all that exists. That loud deafening big bang sound that thundered through the far reaches of deep stellar space is what happened. Luckily there were elements and atoms and aloes and amino and acids and other stuff flying in all directions without a brain to think, to show them what to do, where to go what to become.Then evolution decided it all simply chance just because..for no apparent reason.
But we're going early, going to fuel up on their $1 breakfast (or whatever it costs), drink lots of their awesome Swedish coffee, and hit the ground running, elbows flying.
After we finished digging it all out, we raked it all even, and then sprayed a heavy coat of roundup on it. After waiting 30 minutes (taking a lunch break), we laid down wet newspaper (to further deter growth - thanks for the idea Janelle!), put the border/paver's down, and then put the rocks on top of the newspaper.
"Um, Erica."
Recently, I embraced writing as a gift and I have been exploring the craft of writing. It is exhilarating mostly and frustrating at times. Walking this track is honing my understanding of deepening a gift through recognizing the craft that surrounds it.
Technology is a great thing, and has advanced the human race at an almost unimaginable pace over the last few years. I love being almost a native when it comes to IT and technology. I am not overly confused when a new technology comes out, can sort of understand the way the web works, and don’t completely lose it when it comes to cloud computing ( something my parents don’t really feel comfortable with)
We've no time for later now
One of the goals I had for the show was to find a few stamp companies that would be a good fit for future Miss Art's Papercrafting School classes. And today's post will share with you artwork and product I found in the Magnolia Stamps and La Blanche Stamps booths.
Because the majority of shoppers in Malvern are disabled or pregnant, the allocation of car parking near the front door would reflect this. Fortunately, Malvern is also choc full of chavvy goodness; morons in Polyfilla full MkII Ford Fiestas and boy racered out Citroen Saxos, stand up to this oppression by parking at awkward angles in the drop off point. This ensures that they don't have to walk too far to the hole in the wall, aiding their journey to obesity and a guaranteed parking slot.
All Chris "Chase" Parker wanted was to take Peyton away and keep her safe from harm. But he waited for hours in the rain on judgment day and she never showed--breaking his heart without ever telling him why.
“Continuing his theme, and because he is a bit bored, Charondigliani was taken by the first snow of Winter today. He was also traumatised by Snow White and the Seven Investment Bankers many years ago as a ‘difficult’ child. . Charondigliani’s use of his drug of choice – Rioja – was clearly an inspiration behind this ‘work’. No automobile spraycan paint was used in this – but Charondigliani did use some chalk to create that subtle translucence so necessary to suggest a degree of bollocks in modern painting. Cokehead, Charondigliani’s parrot was also most taken with this painting. When it was first exhibited, a Police Community Support Officer arrested Charondigliani under the Terrorism Act for being in possession of a ‘Class A’ painting. Fortunately, a senior Metropolitan Police Officer friend of Charondigliani was able to tell the PCSO to stop being stupid and go back to eating buns on street corners with his PCSO mates.”Police Community Support Officer Review
Phone lines were cut, mobile phones were confiscated and threats were made against the bosses personal safety.
This was one of those moments for me. I was like: “WTF? did he just say that!”
After passing the autobahn overhead, I was to turn off this street onto a path. The question was where. There were no sign posts with directions to the airport or anywhere else. In fact, the only cycling signs to the airport appeared about half of a kilometer from the destination and it really was well hidden.
Q And, when you use the expression, taking these people out, did you know at the time he told you this who he had reference to?
In November 1952 His Private Secretary, Sir John Colville noted, "He is getting tired and visibly ageing. He finds it hard to compose a speech and ideas no longer flow. (8)
And analysts report that there is something fishy going on at Sushi Bank where it is feared that staff may get a raw deal!
You are worth it. You are worth the extra time to spend on yourself. To make you feel better about yourself. If you are feeling miserable, you have the strength inside of you to change. Trust me. It gets better! Your life is not horrible, but the way you are treating your life is horrible.
“Sweetie…I won’t be in your town until around 2:00 a.m. You really don’t want me to stop by your place for coffee at that time do you?” I’m pretty sure a gasp escaped me… “Uh, NO. Not at 2:00 a.m.! I’ll be asleep!!” Now I heard him laugh out loud. “You ARE geographically challenged…aren’t you? Do you EVEN know where Oregon is?” Humor…laughter…I was back on familiar ground. Felt like myself…the confidence returned.
Don't let me put you off reading Sense and Sensibility: it's an excellent novel, and this post has been more about helping myself to understand my feelings towards it than about coming to any objective conclusion as to the worth of the book. Nevertheless, I fully expect outraged Janeites to disagree - comments and abuse in the usual place, please ;)
There is an author living inside of me. It was clear from my earliest essays in college to the completion of a master’s thesis. The sticking point is this; I am a polished research and grant writer, but when it comes to blogging I’m a floundering novice. The blog experts are always warning about publishing too soon. I have an inner-need to put it out there though. It is a practice. I have the faith to believe and courage to bare my life on these pages. I do it because it is an avocation. If someone likes or learns from reading about my life and adventures then it is an accident of history. I’m simply finding my voice.
I have watched so many things happen in ministry. I have been on the butt-end of alot of ticked off people holding a grudge over something that is easily corrected. The latent removal of all things 'moral' in this country has led to a generation of people that walk into a church setting with the attitude of "you have no right to tell me what morality or values should be" and go on about living the life they choose. My question is this: Why did you come to church if you had already decided that you were not going to take on the morals and values of the Word of God? Is church just something you think you need to do to feel better about yourself? Whose values and morals are you going to live by, if not by God's? Don't get me wrong, it is your choice whose morals you live by.....but if you are coming to a God-centered church and have no intention of living by God's morals and values....why are you there?!?
One trick to eliminate this is to only sharpen your liners when you are ready to use them. That way you will shave off the dried out sections and expose the more fresh, pliable, workable liner.
9. Who is your favorite actor in 4?
-What was the last movie you watched and book you read, and were they any good?
The lights in the bathroom shut off. The dryer died at the same time. “AIIIIIIIIIIIIHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHHH!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!” I screamed and dropped the blowdryer onto the ground. Everything was black and silent except for the echoes of my shriek. I couldn’t see anything at all. Fumbling for the knob, I wrenched the door open, sure that the acid slime monster had killed the power. The darkness would make it easier to eat my face off. Twenty-five years of life experience and courage went out the window. I regressed back to a child immediately and flew down the dark hallway to my parents’ bedroom.
He stands in the hallway watching her leave, his heart pulling at him to follow. He knows he will never see her again, or his wife and kids, but it is his duty to stay and fight, to die like a true soldier.
12 Visit Me
9. And, WHY is Columbus honored with one of our 8 federal holidays in the US when, (a). He didn't "discover" us, or anything previously undiscovered or uninhabited (b). He never set foot on what is now U.S. soil. (c). His legacy is greed, theft, destruction, brutality, slave-trading and murder (d). It is offensive to Latin American, African American and Native Americans( e). Native Americans, who were here and are worthy of a holiday, still don'thave one.
7. Stories by Williams—This is the blog of my friend and fellow writer, Matthew Williams. Here you can find some great reviews of fantasy and sci-fi books, movies, and television shows as well as links to his fabulous fiction for purchase!
The interior is another story. Vivo is all about the mod milieu. Dark wood, silver and black accents with some high-end light fixtures results in the right amount of bada bing.
Sheik Yousuf Al-Qaradhawi Eulogizes Saddam Hussein and Declares: In Recent Years, Saddam Was a Changed Man, Did Charitable Work and Helped People Build Mosques
No telling me what inanimate objects you have fallen for
Zimmerman and other advocates argue that providing a “back door” into online communications to allow government officials to spy on them would make those communications fundamentally insecure, providing a point of vulnerability that hackers could exploit. In Greece in 2005, hackers used just such a back door to eavesdrop on phone calls made by the prime minister and other officials.
This summer, my office began the process of creating a database specifically for savings bonds and that is how we came across the bonds for Trinity Lutheran. We are holding more than $350,000 (face value) in savings bonds. There are more than 3,000 bonds in our vault waiting to be claimed.
Wal: Hmm, well… I’ll see dude. Will get back to you guys on this soon
Korean fans said “They’re really pretty. Japanese fans are sure to come” “This pretty and cute, Japanese fans probably all know them”, placing comments for the support of SNSD.
Matinees: Sun 6th & Sat 12th at 2.45pm
I've always gotten her pictures taken with her glasses on because that's how she looks. She wears glasses, so she has glasses in her pictures. I had her take them off for this picture though because the light was really glaring off them. Someone else asked me a question about how my kids take care of their glasses, but I can't find it for the life of me. I bought Lex's first pair of glasses from Walmart because I didn't know any better. We went camping the day after I picked them up and while riding her bike, they fell off Lexi's face and were crushed in gravel. As soon as we got home from our trip, I took them to Walmart to see if they could fix or replace them and the ultra helpful people there told me they couldn't do anything and I'd need to buy another pair. They broke THE DAY AFTER I GOT THEM! Needless to say, I've never gone back there. I get the kids' glasses from a store called For Eyes. I don't know how wide spread this chain is, but they're wonderful! I can't even count how many times they've fixed, adjusted, or replaced my kids' glasses for free. The glasses are reasonably priced there too.
Cool completely.
One thing about the present Eurocrisis puzzles me.
Yeah yeah, I feel horrible too. I have enjoyed looking at my GPA read 4.0 ugh...
Trees can have the same effect with the way bark grows or possibly tell a story with what we see.
Ok funny facts- I did study for surgery. The only thing that I could control was staying awake for the 4 hours. It would help them remove the tumor more safely. My Dad said the first thing I said in recovery was "I tried so hard Dad to awake" and he responded, I did. I stay awake the entire time! With a few entertaining comments to everyone.
You staleness get out and verbalize to group. The word working" doesn't upright refer to allowingputers to treatment to each remaining; it also refers to grouping talking to apiece different. In your framing, you've got to get out and undergo grouping. Tab the playacting subdivision of your anaesthetic newspaper. There leave be dozens ofworking meetings recorded in there. It doesn't affair that you aren't in the field yet; go to these meetings and see fill. Opening is never a bad entity.
Lao Tzu - Tao Te Ching
All services are provided free of charge.
Still to come, a Final Face-Off between CM Punk and HHH.
“Advocates in this community have worked hard towards achieving their goal. Preservation of Prospect Heights, an architecturally diverse and human-scaled neighborhood is much deserved, and needed now more than ever due to development pressures. This area has already experienced the demolition of historic buildings and out-of-scale construction. I am glad that we can look forward to maintaining the character of our illustrious past and protecting the fabric of this historic neighborhood,” said Council Member James.
So it was time.
According to Human Rights Watch, 500 Serbian civilians died during the bombing, and a number of civilian targets were hit, including hospitals, schools and Serbian Radio and Television buildings in Belgrade. Amnesty International said at the time:
Though his surface glitters gold.
Maybe I’ll bribe him with cookies.
The game was designed for any elementary age children. I am using the easiest levels for my 1st grader, the whole game for my 4th & 6th graders, and I'm even having my 8th grader play it for review and to increase the speed at which he can complete basic equations. When these facts come to mind very quickly, upper level math will come much more easily. Finding educational games that are interesting to the boys has always been a challenge for me, and this one is a keeper.
As I am housesitting up here for the month of July I have had more time to search the neighborhoods. Last week I found a gem, Don Lalo's. It is on a side street, a place you would never randomly drive by because it is squirreled away in the backside of Ojai.
We haven't even had the party yet and she (Blynken) said it was the best birthday ever. So worth the time.
A middle grade fantasy adventure review
Caraway, sesame, fennel or other seeds if desired
If you are feeling, light and elevated in mood, excited to grow in the knowledge of love without conditions, no judgements, total forgiveness so that you forgive yourself of self recriminations, and you forgive others of their transgressions, then you know you are on the right path for your Divine journey. Your heart knows best where to find God, not other people. Listen to your heart. Listen to your gut instinct. Listen to your inner guidance system, for that is exactly how the Divine speaks to you and me.
4. Black-Throated Wind - 7:20
In battered halls, so much withstood,
it's almost better with the great earth tones of a good 'ol lunch sack!
Anyway, I've got to get ready for school. It's almost Friday!
E — Off-shoring jobs to the Third World is good for America because:
or "Teething -- 5 December")
WOW I decided to make a framed vinyl project to give to my step daughter and family. They just got their first house in August and wanted her to have something to hang in her home to remind her of it. It took me four times (LONG too because each time I weeded this and then something went wrong) to get this done. Needless to say my back is killing me!
- You must fill out your GFC name and a valid Email address which counts as 1 entry.
7. Bake for about 10 minutes at 180ºC/gas mark 4. The cookies should be uncooked in the centre, so when they’ve cooled they will be wonderfully soft.
It’s my hope that he becomes more positive about all this as the show moves forward. And I’ll be checking it out when the DVDs come out later this year because DARKNESS RISING ends up being a pretty darn great cartoon. It’s not perfect but it is really good. It’s always great to hang out with Optimus again, of course, but Arcee ends up being the star of the show for me. She takes her anger and hurt at Cliffjumper’s death and first channels it into getting revenge but then ends up salving her hurt by bonding with Jack.
SARAH: Oh yes!
“Yeah. Basically, check these guys out as if I wanted to date them.”
so now it's time to see what you will do: choose salmon or cerise, blush or fuschia... use the merest accent or a daringly dramatic monotone... keep it elegantly C&S or run to a riot of maximalism... (if you don't think that's a real word, please see lauren's card, above, lol!) but make a new holiday card (or cards, plural!) incorporating pink, and link up before 6pm (EST) next wednesday night, october 12th. keyword for galleries and the flickr group is JB41. and now...
Editors prune the leaves and twigs of the trees to make them adhere to the public expectations for a grove. Their work has little to do with actually forming the tree. And they don't direct writers' vigorous forays above ground. They make the forays palatable and digestible. They remove the overgrowth, allowing the reader to view the tree, from ground to twig, in its fullness.
I started out quilting just the lines in the background, then added the stitching in the ditch around the outside of the circle and the triangles in between the star points. I felt it needed a little more so I threw in the pebbles and I'm glad I did. Not only did it give me a chance to practice 3 different styles of quilting, but I think it gave it that last little bit of oomph I was looking for.
We're having a heatwave this week. I tried to sit at my computer to visit you all, but I melted! My house stays cool till the humidity rises, and it sure did this week. Swimming and wading is the only fun outdoor activity when it's this hot.
3. If your books is more than 60,000 words, please don't send it.
We'll be playing some favorites from the Welsh Weekend of Song concert last September, some Scottish pieces I've been wanting to perform for a while, OF COURSE a few beloved Irish songs (thus the "jigs and reels" of the post title) and a couple of my original pieces.
“Give me, O Lord, a steadfast heart which no unworthy thought can drag downwards; an unconquered heart which no tribulation can wear out; an upright heart which no unworthy purpose may tempt aside. Bestow upon me also, O Lord my God, understanding to know you, diligence to seek you, wisdom to find you, and a faithfulness that may finally embrace you; through Jesus Christ, our Lord.” (Prayer of Thomas Aquinas)
13. Avoid gossip and time vampires.
Maren
too!
This is a simple card I put together.
As we had some time to knock off before our flight departed back to Lima, we enlisted the aid of Raul once again who drove us around some other sites around Cusco worthy of your consideration if your travels ever take you down to these here parts of Peru.
She knew she wasn't supposed to be playing where she was. Hence the look.
And the response from PJ Stapleton (who apparently may have been reading a different report)? "As it has done throughout this process, the Board will attempt to take whatever steps it can to maximize the possibility that the wine kiosk program will succeed."
Over the years I've tried to deliver flowers with some regularity to show my appreciation. Here are some flower tips;
When we arrived at Hills Lounge the venue wasn’t packed but as we all know how Pheli people love da night time, as the night progressed people started pouring in. The venue was on point, stage was set and everybody had their dancing shoes on.
Palestinians took to downtown Ramallah’s Manara Square in November to once again stand in solidarity with Egyptians protesting the military regime at a time when Fatah and Hamas were scheduled to meet in Cairo with General Hussein Tantawi. Most recently, it is Syria that has garnered the youth’s focus and since this summer, two solidarity protests for Syria took place in Manara Square.
Zuma has tried to reassure investors that there will be no wholesale change to policy under his administration.
Post-Wyman Stones
And, in case it needs stating, Burke saw the useful role of government as being very limited. As he said: "It is in the power of government to prevent much evil; it can do very little positive good". (See Burke, 1907).
So, now that I spilled the beans ... I can move onto the next item :P
I told the problems to Marty, my auditor and you know what he did ?
After missing out on the festivities last year, I was bound and determined to make my way over to the local comic shop for Free Comic Book Day. Of course I didn't drag my ass out of bed until mid-morning though so by the time I reached the shop (noon) I missed out on some of the more coveted titles, but I did manage to get my paws on a couple of hot items.
As I said we have a sketch for you and here it is......
At the advice of our waitress each of us ordered onion rings with our meals. These onion rings were, without a doubt, the most fantastic onion rings ever. Orgasmic good. Ruined us for all other onion rings good. Then to finish off the meal they served homemade pie! Edward was thrilled that they even had buttermilk. We took some to go for dessert later in the evening.
The MU activity is not synchronous within the muscle.
26 cloves garlic, unpeeled
*Challenges: FTL#171
Penny came next and sashayed down the catwalk in a pair of Black patent courts (Tamaris, £55) and some mad patent kitten heels in fire-engine-stop-the-traffic red by Bronx (£75).
Model R US will be all this in One
How sweet is this story .... Young Gibson accompanied my daughter, riding her pony Iris (the daughter was riding not the dog) around the forest yesterday afternoon. Spring is in the air here and it's frankly plain difficult to stay inside when all this loveliness is beckoning us to come out and enjoy.
alter
If we take a hypothetical example of a factory producing arsenic sweets for children and the sudden medical discovery that arsenic was poison, you could make no serious argument for not banning arsenic sweets. The job losses and economic cost of closing the factory is not a good enough reason to accept the selling of a known poison. The metaphor being that closed pubs is an acceptable cost for the denormalisation of smoking. Lament the loss of pubs by all means, lament many becoming cheap restaurants, but the cost of eliminating smoking is an acceptable one.
Further recommendations from our readers:
that were printed on the pages
After the session, we went to El Taco Tote for lunch. Instead of brochetta, CPT got different kinds of tacos, and I got chicken enchiladas. SO yummy! We ate, then headed back to post. CPT dropped me off at the house, and he headed back to work. Carol was taking a nap, and Paul and I hung for about an hour, then I took a nap for about an hour too. It felt like I just barely closed my eyes, and it was time to go and get the kids from the bus. I wonder if I'm getting sick? You know how you get more sleepy when you're sick? Who knows...
Enjoy happy hour beer/wine specials and hors d'oeuvres from Outpost. This event is free and open to the public.
*If possible, record the entire interaction on video (even if just a cell phone). *Please be aware of your state’s laws in regards to recording public officials. In some states it may be illegal.*
He thinks you are worth it too, so please don't give up!
Baviphat Grape Anti-Wrinkle Gel Cream
Now I'm just some crazy whacked out hormone imbalance that can't get it together anymore. My emotions are all over the map and I can't seem to pull myself together.
coffee table
so that I can type up my stories, as they happen.
Barbra Streisand and the Bee Gees sang it best. We got nothing to be sorry for. And we got nothing to be gilty of. Not when it comes to a love of gold.
1 teaspoon ground cumin
As though, marooned in an airport lounge,
Curtis managed to get to the garage and get the door closed. Like good farm people, we gravitated toward the kitchen windows to watch the storm. I had supper on the stove (no warnings had been issued at this point). After we watched our youngest son’s playground slide fly upward about a dozen feet, I became concerned. Within seconds, I began to hear the terrible sounds a building makes when it begins to rip and break. The large (10 feet high by 16 feet wide) window on the south side of our house began to flex and move. I couldn’t hear the storm as much as I could feel it–like the deep bass rumbling of the trains that pass within a few miles of our house.
1 c feta cheese, crumbled
I recommend the movie to everyone who once in a while wonders about dream reality, sleeping, waking up, life, death…In short, you may enjoy the film more if you find yourself speculating on vague questions about life itself…
Challenge and assess the design suitability of the IT function, testing for effectiveness, efficiency and customer satisfaction, including its structure, processes, governance and diversity. There are several popular frameworks, often used in combination, such as ITIL for service delivery, CMMI for maturity across the software engineering life-cycle and COBIT for governance and risk management. Often outsourced delivery centres and in-house teams, work through connected processes, making process integration a critical link, to achieve predictability. Process wastes like rework are the prime indicator for reviewing the effectiveness of the quality assurance processes, and their adherence. The need for developing a balanced scorecard for IT is evidence alignment with business needs is often ignored.
And if you happen to find a time portal to the past, for goodness sakes don't touch anything! It's called the butterfly effect, and it's nothing you want to mess with.
The growing wave of women of color, especially black women, making the switch to natural hair seems to cause some confusion, because of all the info that is out there. I plan to give you some general guides and my two-cents (as I stated earlier). I hope this will be helpful to somebody.
It’s time for your timey-wimey-wibbly-wobbly Oodcast post to sort all this out!”
The original Trader Vic’s in Scottsdale, Arizona, opened in 1962 on West Fifth Avenue, just six years after the luxe midcentury modern Valley Ho Hotel up the street. It was axis of swank. Then it became the forgotten zone. The Trader Vic's closed. The Valley Ho closed and there was talk of demolition.
As with painting, in which I stopped each session hoping I had finished a piece I may or may not alter later, I stopped after each iteration of the manuscripts – they were each finished works of Art. Between iterations, I’ve read and written a number of other stories – all of which draw upon my Mortui Philosophies. That practice strengthened the Pazuzu Trilogy each time I returned and made refinements. This EIGHTH REVISION is the latest. Upon completing the Seventh, I declared the story itself is set in stone. That is the case with the Eighth. The Seventh revision was good, but the Eighth is better. This one glows in firelight – read and see! I mean that, I’m a very sensory-based, visual author.
Here is a close﻿-up so you can see the embossing and glossy accents a little better. More details on my blog :)
In Beyond Good and Evil (1886), Nietzsche gives us a number of witty aphorisms, which according to him shed light on the deeper layers and vanities of female psychology. He states:
Krishna’s Dharma is samAja dharma – the welfare of the worlds and it is aligned with samAja nyAya – social justice.
So seems how I have all the time in the world right now...I have been a crazy, busy, woman cooking dinner. I know most of you are shocked, but come on anyone can cook. I can honestly say that I have blown my husband away also. He tells me he may have to work double on the gym time. Okay so here we go!
(pure sinful) Potato Salad
Relax? Oh, mercy, I don’t bother to do that nearly enough. I have to justify everything I do as being somehow productive, or I feel like I’m frittering my life away. However, those infrequent times when I’m willing to say, “Forget productivity, I wanna do this!” I’ll usually double back to re-smell the roses. Read stuff I wrote. Listen to music I composed. Look back on old drawings. Or maybe hang out on DeviantArt to look at other people’s drawings, while listening to others’ songs on Pandora Radio or YouTube. Or reread someone else’s book (I specify rereading, since I may count reading something the first time as a sort of productivity). And, oh yeah, gab on the phone with Tirzah at all hours; when we’re not annoying the snot out of each other and don’t have to carry the emotions of character drama, that can be quite relaxing (and circumspectly productive. Our immaterial pillow fort’s an inspiring place).
Earlier this year Rospatent refused to grant to Royalty, the Russian beverage producer, trade mark protection for the brand of vodka that makes reference to the names of Russia’s Prime Minister Vladimir Putin and President Dmitry Medvedev.
There is also a long and wide-ranging essay here which highlights the convergence between conservative and neo-liberal or libertarian ideas: "From the 1950s to the present, libertarianism has been an important and influential - arguably the most influential - stream of thought on the Right, informing both Republican policy making and conservative ideology more generally". The author faults libertarianism, however, for not coming to terms with the fact that lots of people seem to WANT big government and says that it is only the New York neoconservatives who are realistic about that fact. He presents the neoconservatives as being the practical, pragmatic dealers in political reality. He does definitely have a point but I would argue that no libertarian is unaware of how difficult it is to implement any part of a libertarian agenda and that ALL conservatives compromise with the possible. The difference is that the libertarians have the clearest vision of the direction in which they want to head -- and the best evidence that their ideas work for the general betterment.
What is the need in todays senerio is to provide best and customized treatment which is most suited to that particular person. Still there is huge common cohort of osteoarthritic people who can be offered either TKR or HTO. Responsibilities lie upon we doctors to see what procedure suits most to that particular person, rather then driven by many other things.
You and I don’t propose a federal budget. The President does.
Having only played with my mom's iPad (my mom's iPad, how wrong is that sentence?), I wasn't sure what it would be like using a tablet as my only computer while at the conference.
some of my favorite OOTDs...
- lots of cantaloupe (about 1 wedge)
As you know, my first priority are to purebred GSPs in Wisconsin's shelter system. As you know, I'm thinking "adoptability" immediately. I get a couple lines into this bio and I'm done. The dog sounds fairly unadoptable to me. And that pisses the tester off (she's with border collie rescue) because she's apparently one of those dog rescue folks who love pity cases. Who wouldn't? I mean, doesn't every being have it's worth? Why of course. But remember, my responsibility is also to adopters who come to us to adopt the "perfect" dog. As you know, they don't want old dogs, they don't want barkers, runners, aggressive, fat, untrained; well, you get my drift. So, what about Tootsie? Is any of this her fault? Why of course not. But is it my responsibility? HELL NO! These are the things that make my face go numb, making me wonder if the "big one" is coming, as in stroke time. Here is the bottom line folks. I am not God. I am not a saviour. Now I will loose sleep over Tootsie's crappy ass situation, and it's not her fault or mine. It is what it is. All I can do is put the word out, keep my ears and eyes open, and perhaps someone will come along who wants Tootsie. But today's not looking like her lucky day. And I will carry that until I get lucky enough to forget. If possible. It plains sucks. If you can't look at having a dog for the "long term", walk away. Don't make me have to be 'the responsible'. You will only shove me up one more rung on the "stroke-o-meter" ladder.
Feminist rhetoric is high and you may not even think twice. Honour killing is a “crime against women”, they say! No doubt, there are victims of honour killing. But just not women. Men have it even worse. In places where such crimes take place, its usually the men - who being the groom / lover – has to face biggest brunt of the community’s reaction against the marriage. Because they think that its the man who must have lured the woman away.
My second beer from Rogue, thanks to the Cask Kitchen & Pub bottle sale. Their timely sale (to create space in their massive fridges) allowed me to buy a few nice bottles for home drinking.
Oh there is such great encouragement in Psalm 30 which says: "Weeping may endure for a night, but joy comes in the morning . . . You have turned for me my mourning into dancing, You have put off my sackcloth and clothed me with gladness"
Q:Among the books,films and fashion that you have recently enjoyed, are you into anything?
Fingers crossed, that I finally ate correctly this year, I woke up this morning and I felt GREAT! No fatigue, or feeling like there was a 10 pound brick in my tummy…just happiness and satiation!
However, if an investor holds the property for 20 years, he or she is likely to have lived through significant boom and busts in the property cycle. Because of the lack of daily quoted resale valuations, many investors never stop to consider price fluctuations and mistake the lack of quoted price for stability.
For the dressing I used the zest of 1 lime, 3 tablespoons of lime juice, 1/2 cup sour cream, 1/2 cup light mayo, 1 teaspoon of salt, and 1 teaspoon of pepper.
Kirk Ross of the Carrboro Citizen posted on Facebook about the bus being in Mt. Airy today. I mentioned listening to Gene Nichol Friday night on NC People and Kirk replied Gene was also on the bus.
While your baby is learning to walk around the house, let her go barefoot. She will be able to balance and coordinate her steps if she can feel the ground beneath her feet.
1) It protects our young people from getting ensnared in very difficult situations, 2) it assists parents in protecting their kids, just as the state driving laws do, and 3) it sends a really clear message that is necessary to our community that safety is a high priority.
Summer doesn’t exactly conjure up images of pen and paper, but there are many summer writing ideas for children that will keep them excited about the season.
Monday 8th - Outing to an attraction on Dartmoor. £5 per person, adult or child, under 3's free.
Most serious (laughs). For example, I’m the first one to wake up in the morning and I’m the type to finish preparations first.
Let's take a look at retrosheet and see what happened in this game.
I don't know how many times I have to tell people this. Waitstaff do not make a liveable wage. Here in Massachusetts we make $2.68 an hour. Oh and that is after the raise we just got, it was $2.63 an hour until a few weeks ago. We survive on tips. Also we do not pocket all that we are given. We have to tip out bussers, bartenders, food runners and whoever else the company you work for decides you need to.
And yet it feels more than paper. It feels like she whispered to me, her little hummingbird spirit flitting around my ear, whispering, "You didn't dream me, Mama. I was here. I was real. You don't have to do anything anymore, but just rest."
I remember the beginning, with my mom and I’m with her now, in the sunset of her life. I will remind her of the children playing, the birds and beautiful trees and flowers. Because on the other side of, that brick wall, those things really do exist. Because the end of the beginning, is really the true beginning!
So please go and retenter on this blog: www.smootchkiss.blogspot.com
Presepe Vivente~the Living Nativity
I've noticed a strong correlation between having a meltdown and getting a pedicure, it seems when ordered out of the house for bad behavior I can't think of anything else to do. (Like the dark blue? I bypassed all the pretty colours for something more suitable to my mood).
The ribbon....ah, the ribbon. I didn't have any ribbon that would coordinate so I took a piece of the Very Vanilla Seam Binding and using my Concord Crush Stamp Pad and a sponge, I sponge-dyed the ribbon to match. How cool is THAT? It's absolutely lovely in person.
34For fear of the great body of people, or for fear that families might make sport of me, so that I kept quiet, and did not go out of my door;
I felt perfect
All bloggers are noisesome.
Step into any coffee shop or diner that carries the rolling news, however, and you'll find that in the land of the free not everything is as free as it seems. Over the past few weeks, right-wing politicians have launched an all-out assault on women's sexual and reproductive freedom and LGBT rights, attacking not just gay marriage and abortion but
BTW, the carved wooden chest with the slot on top invites visitors to donate money or valuables to the monastery.
Some PSAs are created as a public service for charities by ad agencies, but often are produced by the government. I happened to have the radio on in my car last Sunday when they ran a block of PSAs. One in particular sticks in my mind.
town ordinances; I shall hang it in the Louvre! Nobody
In a referendum election, all Mr. Romney has to do is satisfy voters that he’s competent, advocates sensible remedies to the nation’s economic dilemma, and plans to stop Uncle Sam’s profligate spending and not raise taxes. Romney is well-suited to accomplish all three aims. Romney’s character hasn’t been an issue through a grueling intraparty vetting; it shouldn’t be one in the General Election, despite anticipated efforts by Mr. Obama’s team and the left to do so.
To be in His presence and feel His great work and wisdom flow through me -a flawed human -was a delight unlike anything I could ever hold. And that was because the delight in His guidance was something that more or less held me instead of me holding it. In this moment, I reveled in His presence. And that was the cause.
And – in the style of a Murdloid – the Slog asks an even simpler question: Did Silvio Berlusconi go on his Italian Channel’s news show to proclaim his innocence on 34 charges of birth certificate tampering…..or did he do it in his own slot during prime time? (The twist in this second question is that we also have the answer: he booked himself a twenty minute non-news slot so to do).
to the point of weighing 430 pounds and had never eaten organically -
I also have some neat news to share, my dear friend Sherri has nominated me for the Liebster award!
Tables were supplied with baskets full of scrap paper, tissue paper, sequins, hole punches, glue sticks, yarn, scissors, background paper, 3 pre-cut cupcake bottoms and 3 icing tops. I explained that the tops for the icing could be covered and decorated or used as a template to trace on scrap paper and then the scrap paper could be cut out and used.
“Leopold de Rothschild, who has died aged 84, was a member of the Rothschild banking family and had a distinguished career in finance; his greatest passions, however, were classical music and steam trains, and he was well known as a leading musical philanthropist.”
I challenge you to target one (or more) who doesn’t exercise the fruit of kindness in his or her life. Purposely, hard as it may be, speak a kind word to her or him. Write it down if you don’t have courage to speak it. Don’t base it on whether or not the recipient deserves it; do it as an exercise of obedience to God. Is there one of us who deserves God’s kindness? As you fulfill the Biblical principle of sowing what you desire to reap, you may be surprised at the result. Or maybe you won’t, but You will be growing, stretching, and exercising the fifth fruit of the spirit listed in Galatians 5:22,23. After all, it’s easy to show kindness in response to kindness, but the real fruit of people’s character is seen when they respond in kindness to an unkind word or act.
To see the one I miss
86. “Nurture your mind with great thoughts. – Benjamin Disraeli
Jesus stood on the shore. He didn't help because he couldn't swim. He patiently watched Amos drown. He watched Lazarus save himself. He did not intervene.
I, for one, am a stickler for dialogue. Certain contractions were not in use in the early part of the 19th century, hence, cannot, do not, would not. I have an etomylogical dictionary for that purpose and I try and stay as close to the word choices of the day that I can.
ISBN-13: 978-0764209741
Brody & Kylee had their 6 month check up with their developmental pediatrician a couple of weeks ago. Both are a bit behind in most areas but are making tremendous progress in getting where they need to be and “catching up” after their rough beginning. I always love these long appointments with our developmental ped. as we get a great, thorough examination and look at exactly where they fall developmentally and best of all, I always walk away with a renewed sense of pride knowing how far they’ve come! They both weighed in at about 31lbs and great news, Kylee’s head circumference is not only staying consistent with her own growth curve, but it’s on the charts!
So my immediate plans are as follows:
I’m just about keeping up with my music, I can hit play on iTunes and it all gets played about 10 times before the month is up, and I have 90 new Emusic downloads to listen to.
I can’t help it either.
The PPP since 1992 has been corralling citizens and entire communities into poverty as part of a deliberate plan to render them toothless and delete their dignity. Linden, New Amsterdam, Buxton and Victoria have all been invaded and infected by the ram-rod PPP. Their citizens have been shot in the back, electricity has been denied, the roads have been neglected, health facilities have been shuttered and school personnel and equipment have been curtailed. Certain cultural events and celebrations such as Mashramani, Guyfesta, Parish , Masquerade bands and Agriculture fairs, have been disbanded. National Service, Guyana People’s Militia, Guyana Rice Board, AGRI BANK, GBC, GPC, GUYSUCO OTHER CROPS, MOBLISSA dairy farms, Ebini Farms, SURAPANNA farms, Buytenabu farms, GAC, GPL and a whole host of other organizations that were created to ensure employment and activity for Guyanese across the board, were dissolved.
(saffron) Sauce
That was Mr. Parker’s way of joking, but Johnny wasn’t laughing. Just slobbering, and bleeding, and letting his tongue slide through that hole.
A tale that is largely played out iniside their respective heads. The point of view switches continually, fuelling each character’s fire with increasingly heated dramatic irony.
CHALLENGE 99 - PLAIN & SIMPLE!
Hold on tight to my hand
Fantastic beer, great story and overall feel about this beer, I can't wait to see what the guys come out with next.
Aromatic SoulCollage®
9 Swan Lee 2:43 June 20, 1968 - Backing Track
I was left questioning everything that had happened in my life.
That you’re not just some wandering soul
Along the road he meets a friend. Smiling,
where would he be?
I believe one reason is because of the humility it helps to develop within us. If I am daily thanking God for _________ , then I am less likely to develop a sense of entitlement for ________ . Whether that is my health, my home, family, friends, financial provision, ministry, food, conversations, books, art, music, etc....
A more somber tale is found in A Disobedient Girl by Freerman ($15.00, Washington Square Press), a heartbreaking tale of two women, connected by a shared and tragic history, yet separated by their respective destinies. Set in the author’s native Sri Lanka, a beautiful country where fate, religion, and sorrow are universal, a five year old Latha is brought into a home as a servant girl and companion to Thara, the daughter of the house who is also five. Though they are as close as sisters, Latha rebels against a life of servitude. There is much more to this story that takes you into another culture, another world. The world of the Amish in America is another culture and it is the backdrop for two Amish-Country mysteries by P.L. Gaus in Blood of the Prodigal ($13.00, Plume) and Broken English ($13.00, Plume). The seemingly serene Amish communities in Holmes County, Ohio, would not appear to be places where crime occurs, but it does as in the case of the first novel in which a young Amish boy vanishes and a search begins. The trail leads to the murder of the son of prominent member of the church. In the latter novel, a marauding ex-convict descends on the town of Millersburg, Ohio where the sheriff is joined by a professor and pastor in a quest to end a wave of local violence. These mysteries pit the values of the Amish, love and forgiveness, against the society in which they live and this makes for very interesting reading.
3 cups quinoa, rinsed and drained
Stan Getz – Tenor Sax
Better lighting is needed.
I decided it was probably because I don't know
and elevated Ethiopian literature
Research Essay: The topic of your research paper is open to any major aspect of contemporary film and media theory. Ideally, the project should build on one of the major movements we covered in class (Feminist Film Theory, Postmodernism, Convergence, Post-Racial Whiteness, and so on). As part of that, your paper will want to engage in-depth with the work of film and/or media theorists. They do not have to be ones we read in class, but their work should in some way reflect the spirit of the area(s) we covered. The topic must be approved by me in advance. Develop a coherent, convincing argument, using at least three sources (including at least two from outside the class’s assigned readings). The research paper should be at least 6-8 full pages, double-spaced. It will be graded on strength and originality of argument; command of theory and general use of outside sources; avoiding too much narrative summary; convincing, specific details to illustrate your points; and, just as importantly, general writing style, which includes organization, tone, proofreading and so forth.
Kim is currently closed to submissions. Please check the Submissions page of the BookEnds website periodically for an announcement about when she's open to queries again.
With the advent of Hollywood, the Internet, and multi-media sources of storytelling, readers are more sophisticated than ever. They are also more impatient. They want to jump into the middle of the mayhem. So get them there faster.
“I’m going to warn Queen Firefly something is eating the Moon!”
The political spinning and twists are fun to follow, but where’s the virtue and the good for Chicagoans here? An increased heart rate and the attendant stress from a show with little balance and no relief is not worth watching.
“Without a purpose, nothing should be done.” (Marcus Aurelius)
Consider the unfortunate case of Kentucky’s Republican candidate for the Senate, Rand Paul. (Short for Randall, for those who were wondering.) In a recent interview, MSNBC commentator Rachel Maddow repeatedly questioned Paul about his documented concerns with the 1964 Civil Rights Act. The whole interview was painful, though your reasons for finding it so will likely depend upon your political leanings. For her part, Maddow proved genuinely incapable of imagining an approach to an issue that is neither a) premised solely on the liberty of the individual or b) dependent upon direct political action. Sadly, Maddow is not alone in this struggle. But Paul came off as uncertain and disingenuous. His attempts to frame the debate more broadly looked more like an attempt to dodge a tough question. And as Ross Douthat has noted, Paul doesn’t seem to understand the limits of ideology.
-can make you wish it had.
it's caused me to really think about my heart and the why....why i pray?
How could I not write about Crohn’s? To say I’ve had some crazy experiences is a glorious understatement. You can’t make this stuff up. And thus, it’s perfect writing material.
100) I like shiny glass things. When I was 1, my mother tells me I bit into a glass ball ornament for our Christmas tree, even though I knew better. They rushed me to the hospital and I was just fine.
The green bin is for garden waste, leaves and plants, small branches, weeds and grass cuttings etc. Among the other things that are on the list for collection in this bin is small animal bedding, providing they are not meat eaters and this includes rabbits.
Revati lived right beside her. Her door was open, she looked inside; Taru was sleeping. She entered the room and started to look around. There was a pile of mail on her desk; she started to read them quickly; it explained a little, they were from her family and friends outside the Home, she had quite a lot of them who kept regular touch with her. The mails were really mean, full of taunting and malice.
I am so sorry I haven't been on here for a couple of weeks. We moved and it has been so crazy. It has been hard getting internet that doesn't cost an arm and a leg at our new house because we live out in the middle of nowhere but it should be up and running soon. Crossing my fingers.
Later, after a grocery run, I thought I'd clean the oven. It's one of those self-cleaning deals. It wanted cleaning because the night before I'd tried to make blueberry bread and had an epic fail. I'm sure it was baker's error - the recipe is clear, concise, easy. The pan overflowed and spilled batter and crumb-topping stuff on the oven floor. It looked a little messy, but not too bad - certainly not as bad as it's been in there. I figured I'd crank it up and let 'er rip. Um...yeah...about that...
R - That's so last century, Howard. Get with the times.
to just wander taking pictures
And, likewise, neither is art dead. Art in the modern age still reflect a reach towards that which is greater than us. Art is beginning to take on unrecognizable forms unto increasingly diverse mediums merely to mirror the fact that ”that which is greater than us” is remodeling itself into abstract concepts – with names like Goodness. Joy. Love. Justice. Happiness. Peace. Truth. Modern art aims to attain these abstractions that we’ve established as Divinity of the modern age. Given this, the last quote from a relatively modern artist, takes on an added meaning.
help us understand
Because if you’re in favour of forcing your beliefs on others by law, then you are, in my opinon, an arsehole.
hey, when the Zia family is concerned, exaggerating things
Selangor-based DRB began manufacturing its first Volkswagen AG Passat vehicles several weeks ago after signing a partnership agreement with the German carmaker last year.
I’m officially taking my vote away from Obama. You can’t run on platforms to get elected, then go on television and become the cool President, all the while undermining the people who voted you in. Sell it to someone else! I’m through listening; become a man of conviction. You have single handily proven why we are IMPERIALISTS.
Silver was the metal of choice for Renaissance Italians. They gave their loved ones highly ornate silver betrothal rings engraved and filled with black enamel. When gold became the metal of choice in Europe, the silver ring was still given at the betrothal. Later, an identical gold ring was given during the marriage ceremony. This may be where the concept of dual rings originated.
After being sick for so long last month, this past month, she has really been wonderful!
If we can’t be silent and we can’t speak, where does that leave us?
He kept saying that these creatures are from the wild, and though they are his pets, he’s always paying attention and keeps an eye on them during the show, or when he handles them. He was very interesting to listen to. I had fun.
I going off with Hannah and Catherine for the summer, we're gonna rent an apartment, they're gonna work in respectable office jobs for some good money, I'll be a waitress in a hotel and work crap shifts for crap money, we'll promise ourselves to do loads of Chicago-ey things but never actually do them.
And that He is still there in the midst of it.
Okay, so I was going to post every day of our trip, but that probably won't happen since some of the nights we'll be camping. So I'm just going to go with it...and post whenever I have internet access.
*Not getting paid for this, I swear (and wish).
One of the things the author says is that people tend to forget their were other troops there, besides the Australian and New Zealanders. I mean there were other troops fighting WITH the Anzacs. Obviously there were troops fighting against them.
Given by Papa God, August 27, 2011
When you are ready to get an agent you should know a few things.Legitimate agents only take 10 percent and they should NEVER charge you a monthly fee or startup fee.They should not force you to use a certain photographer to take your headshots.If they do, they are probably just signing you up so that you’ll hire the photographer and they’ll get a kick-back.Agents should only make money if you make money.An agent may ask you to sign a contract – this is normal.A standard contract is for 1-2 years.I would not sign a contract for more than 3 years.And, READ THE CONTRACT.A friend of mine met with an agent who tried to write a clause into the contract that made it so that, at the agent’s discretion, the contract never ended.If you are unsure, contact SAG and ask them for a standard Agent/Client agreement.Ask if the agent you are thinking of going with is SAG certified.
Doors will open 90 minutes prior to showtime for dinner.
Jackson later learned those tribes were large contributors to members of the Government Operating Committee which reviews gaming compacts before they go to each body of the Legislature. Referring to the Quechan and Yurok agreements, Jackson said, “our compacts never got out of the committee.”
I’m in trouble, he thought, very big trouble.
Southampton returned to the Premier League after a seven-year absence with goals from Billy Sharp, Jose Fonte, Jos Hooiveld and Adam Lallana securing promotion on the final day of the Championship season.
Ok, that's it from me for tonight. I actually got some cards made in advance but I'll be saving those for the weeks to come! Still going strong on my goal of crafting/posting three times a week. I gotta pace myself though, tee hee! I might need one of those when I get behind.
Well, that pretty much sums up my feeling & general rambling thoughts about each subject/subject area that we currently cover in out homschool.
Do you like historical romances set in the Old West? Why?
Resistance
With a continuously running clock do one pull-up the first minute, two pull-ups the second minute, three pull-ups the third minute… continuing as long as you are able.
Gregory: did big football destroy Penn
sprang up below me, her soles touching mine,
Candy Cakes
DONNIE MCCLURKIN
Comments from Supreme Court justices on Wednsday are indicating that they may be ready to find in favor of upholding Arizonas immigration laws in a decision expected later this summer.
- Why the early bird gets the worm;
Here, let me slap you around a little bit. And then I’ll tell you I love you.
After that I jog up by the rear gate of Orgrimmar where we keep all the siege engines, find one that looks pretty stable, and bench press it. Nothing too major, just a couple hundred reps. Then I head over to the arena and spar with some of my Kor’gron personal guards for a couple hours. The ones that live get to keep their jobs.
Journalists have become empty vessels, to be filled on the day with plausible but inaccurate material, sufficient to fill space in a newspaper, but a travesty of the truth.
(Colin & Greg)
Oh yeah, sorry this post is pretty long because it's my first week!
Now, four things to end with:
Stewpot is flanked by two young blonde girls in ties, white trousers and untucked shirts, looking vaguely like sailor costumes in fact. "You might recognise two of the faces here" - actually, Ed, there's only two people there, so in that you're asserting nobody recognises your face - "they're two of the daughters of the Beverley sisters, Teddy and Joy", pointing to each in turn. Teddy and Joy were two of the actual Beverley Sisters, so clearly their daughters didn't deserve publicly given names yet. I have consequently no idea if these are the precise daughters of Teddy and Joy who formed a close harmony group called The Foxes,, but from the matching dress you'd imagine so, which would explain why, even in 1976, anyone bar Ed Stewart should care about two of the daughters of the Beverley sisters being introduced to a Top Of The Pops audience. Why might we recognise them anyway if the best Stewpot can come up with is identifying them by their mothers? You might go on to rhetorically ask why a 1976 Top Of The Pops audience should care about the bloke from Godspell prancing in a bowler hat singing about having a party on a ship, but such is pop life. In fact how Stewpot actually ends is "...Teddy and Joy. Here's Paul Nicholas!", so clearly he can't come up with much either. Paul's back in the studio, white jacket and bowler as per, nobody else out to help him this time. This means he has no fallback when he finds he can't help himself on the ad libs. All I'll say is the captain seems to have developed a Jamaican accent. Reggae like it used to be, indeed. Audience members try their best but Nicholas still effortlessly laps them for enthusiasm at this stuff. Orchestra and overmiked Ladybirds make a mess of this, by the way, though it proves they had a specialist penny whistle player.
In spite of thousands of biomedical studies to the contrary(7), Wessely famously asserted that “ME is simply a belief, the belief that one has an illness called ME” in his address entitled “Microbes, Mental illness, the Media and ME: the Construction of Disease” delivered to ... Read more>>
Emphasize Return On Engagement to Measure Social Media is the 44th in a series of excerpts from our book, Be a Person: the Social Operating Manual for Enterprises (itself part of a series for different audiences). At this rate it’ll be a long time before we get through all 430 pages, but luckily, if you’re impatient, the book is available in paper form at http://bit.ly/OrderBeAPerson and you can save $5 using Coupon Code 62YTRFCV
Excuse me......I'm going to go spend time in my happy place.
9. Frozen veggies – Again very nice and convenient to have. All the work is done for me, I don’t have to cut anything, I still have some freedom to spice them and bake them to what I want and it’s an easy way to get your serving of veggies for the day (if you throw them in a soup or casserole).
Also please realize: this store is CRAZY BUSY. This means we probably cannot give you the personlized service you normally would get. AND, when you throw shit on the floor, it means we have even LESS time to spend with you. So, be nice, ask for the possible, not the impossible or just plain stupid (like having us calling all over Texas so that you can locate a 9 dollar pair of gloves is probably something that would not constitute a good use of time right now. No one will answer the phone cuz they're all too busy.)
Tracklist from the ride home:
9) Keep my body healthy and my appearance lovely
Thank you for letting me ramble on these past few years, watching as I follow my passion and plunge headfirst into the wine business. Without your support I would never have been able to do this. So it is with utter sincerity that I say:
04. Ceremony
Bunny & Layers are cut from Kate's ABC pg. 34 at 2.50"
Yes, they’re all different inside
You could of course, use a different tinned fish and add other spices or herbs.
One of the most notable and perhaps profound of those influences was Arthur Schopenhauer whom Nietzsche discovered in 1865 while at University. Schopenhauer’s metaphysical vision at odds with Christianity, encapsulated in The World as Will and Representation, was to shape Nietzsche’s philosophical undertakings more than any other. A year later Nietzsche was introduced to Wagner, with whom he felt a deep affiliation through mutual love of both music and philosophy. Wicks notes: “Partly on the basis of their shared enthusiasm for Schopenhauer, the two men struck up a father-son style of friendship and they remained in contact for the next decade, until Nietzsche’s growing anti-Christian view of life became incompatible with Wagner’s.” Later, Nietzsche irreparably widened the division by openly and virulently criticising his one-time idol in The Case of Wagner. In the essay Nietzsche lambasts the Wagnerian tradition with unrelenting ardour, finding it to be “brutal, artificial and unsophisticated” and thereby symptomatic of the degenerative trend in music. He is no less vituperative when speaking of the composer himself, querying: “Is Wagner a man at all? Is he not rather a disease? Everything he touches he contaminates. He has made music sick,” before concluding: “Wagner’s art is diseased. The problems he sets on the stage are all concerned with hysteria; the convulsiveness of his emotions, his over-excited sensitiveness, his taste which demands ever sharper condimentation, his erraticness which he togged out to look like principles, and, last but not least, his choice of heroes and heroines, considered as physiological types (—a hospital ward!—).”
Micropolitan areas are defined by the U.S. Census Bureau as a rural county whose largest city does not exceed a population of 50,000. The U.S. has a total of 576 micropolitan areas.
Though thou art tender yet thy humble bard
Here is another closer shot
Why is that hypothesis only used to benefit Blacks in White countries outside Africa?
I call this a salad, but technically it's hot. I make it all the time, usually with quinoa. Sometimes bulgur or barley. Whatever I have at hand really.
It was a fun night, so needless to say, Saturday morning came quick! After an early birthday party, we decided to spend the afternoon in downtown McKinney. One of the things I love about Texas is all the small towns, and their well-preserved downtown Squares. There's always a gorgeous old courthouse in the middle, and the streets surrounding are lined with unique shops and restaurants.
pull the axe from its wound
When I got home that day, Tj had the house all clean and romantic. He had flowers for me, chocolate covered strawberries (my favorite and way better than chocolates) and had made reservations for dinner at Carrabba's our favorite Italian place.
suffixes so that's what we will be doing with
Esky - ice box cooler/ice chest
For the white layers, I didn't have any sweetened condensed milk on hand, so I ended up using a 12 oz. can of evaporated milk with 2/3 cup sugar whisked in. I think it ended up tasting the same, however after the gelatin hardened the consistency wasn't as firm as it should have been, which didn't surprise me since evaporated milk is much more watery than sweetened condensed milk.
Mac security firm Intego has reported that a spyware application it calls OSX/OpinionSpy is being spread as a program called PremierOpinion.
According to Causality, if we do an action toward something, the effect will come from that same thing — so in extension, if we do good to someone, something good will come from that person. However, ECL is different from causality. The result we receive doesn’t always come from the same person, it can come from other person.
To make it more fun, I put in a low-level keyboard hook after establishing device communication, so that it would send a move command on every keydown stroke, so the faster you type, the faster the Hamster runs!
Wagner
* Recipes from those who are not bloggers are welcome. Please send me your name, location, recipe, and optional photo. I will ensure you are included in the drawing/s and round-up.
A: No body
Petra of WEST and brewer Felix were on hand to give some background about the brewery and introduce their beer, WEST Hefeweizen. The beer arrived thick with yeast and still bubbling despite the huge head of foam. It had a strong banana aroma and was remarkably tangy. Felix says the beer is 80% wheat, much more than a typical wheat beer even in Bavaria.
I have to wear sunglasses for a whole week ANY time I’m outside, and I have to wear protective goggles while I’m sleeping or napping to make sure I don’t accidentally rub my eyes in my sleep.
(James Elroy Flecker)
"I think posting WIWs or WIBs elicits positive comments from women who *adore* the thing, but it still is not right for the poster. It is extremely rare that a commenter will say, "Uh, I don't think so". They don't want to hurt someone's feelings or make us feel worse, because the thing's been bought.
8. Rogue Chocolate Stout
-Mammograms are performed by a certified, licensed mammography technologist in conjunction with the Multi-Diagnostic Services (MDS).
I've not written anything this week due to the fact that I found out some sad news a few days ago, and didn't have much of a heart to write about it until now. It seems that Bay Girl is not staying with us to foal out, but is instead leaving on March 1st to go foal out at another facility. Seeing as her job of uterus will be fulfilled once the foal is weaned, she will not be returning to us. I have no idea where she will go once she her job is complete, or if I will see her again. Chances are that I won't.
It took me several days to work this out...I'd play with this or that and then leave it on my messy desk. The trick was to make a template in cardstock of the shape, draw that on a thin piece of foam(but wider then the item is) by tracing around the template with a sharpie marker. Then cut out the drawn shape making it deep enough for the item to sit in so only one surface is exposed! As a precaution I also wrapped the edges of the suitcases and perfume bottles with tape before embedding them in the foam as well.
I hope that you are all having a wonderful Christmas.......Enjoy!
Winner #1 - Gvendalen (Helena) has won the template "Ees in the Bag". Congratulations, Helena! Please email Adela for your template. You will need to let her know which template you won.
Tonight she warmed up some as she walked all over the living room. Little crazy girl. Fall down, get up, walk walk walk… fall down, get up, walk walk walk… I was tired just watching. And Braska didn’t even attempt to keep up.
Here's the ballot writeup about his performance last Sunday:
Looking forward to having internet again! Typing posts on a phone is a bit taxing!
Michael's mother and aunt drove down from Idaho to be with us. My children are so blessed to have these strong women in their lives. They have testimonies that they aren't afraid to share. Michael comes from a line of pioneer stock that is proud of their heritage. I love that my children have that to claim as their own. Thank you to the generations of faithful Latter-day Saints that have carried the Restored Gospel to this day.
not to worry I could pick any knobs I wanted to anyway. Which is picked the two above. His and Hers. My husband is amazingly crafty and can make anything work the way we want. I can't wait to hang these in the bathroom and use them as our new towel hangers.
Back to the race. I really was not feeling doing this race and was somewhat worried that I was burnt out on triathlons! But luckily that’s not the case as I had a really fun time; I think I am STILL super tired from producing TriRock. My dad and I drove down to the race site on Saturday morning and for once his wave went off before mine. So I mingled around reconnecting with old friends and chatted about the course and our race strategies. The swim was an out and back in a channel so it should have yielded fast times. NOT SO MUCH. I guess spending all Friday surfing (about 4 hours worth) was not the best way to taper before having to race an oly distance triathlon. Well I came out of the water in 27:43 not fast but not super slow either. I ran through T1 and had to move someone’s stuff out of the way which was a total PIA.
Not surprisingly, of the elite bundlers who made up Obama’s 2008 campaign, the second most represented industry after law was the securities and investment industry. It’s a level of hypocrisy has outraged even committed leftists. Industrial Areas Foundation activist Mike Gecan put it squarely: “I’m from Chicago, I’ve seen this game played my whole life.”
She is in Ontario, her fiance is in Nova Scotia, and she is getting married in New Brunswick! Lots of plans are being made with the help of emails, long-distance phone calls, and the “mother of the bride”, aka “me”, running errands and contacting local vendors.
Be sure to dress in a favorite dress or princess attire!
"In your case, it's performing remarkably well. You surprise me each time you come in."
Obviously hanging with your family is a little different than parenthood, but we did learn some responsibilities of having three children would be like.
Unfortunately, sometimes it takes almost losing a friend to realize how very important that friend is to us. It's just one of those really difficult life lessons. The ones that really have to hurt so we can learn from them.
Some days I miss my mom so incredibly badly and the pain of her leaving feels just as strong as the day it happened almost 6 years ago.
Whatever your customs and practices, this is a great time to see and spend time with family and friends! Happy Easter and Chag Sameach!
Hedonist Beer Jive verdict: 5 SEASONS is a high cut above most local brewpubs, particularly chains. No doubt we’ll be coming back here in the near future.
Barney was really lovely with the children and had a little chat with them before signing autographs. He even wrote "So nice to meet you!" on her programme.
Senior nutritionist, Jo Nicholas, who led the research for the trust said: “These findings show that even just 12 to 18 months after the final standards came into effect, as many secondary schools were getting to grips with the changes, the legislation was already making a significant impact – not just for what was on the menu but also for what teenagers were actually eating.
A new study reveals that over 20 percent of patent filings can now be traced to mobile technology. The findings suggest that the industry may be the future of innovation.
The Lord just gave to the twelve disciples the so-called great commission. Then the momentous occasion of His ascension into heaven took place as He had promised. On thatMount of Olivesthe disciples stood gazing as you would the departure of a loved one.
It's taken me over a month to go through them all and decide on which ones to give him and which to discard. I'm crap at post production, photoshop fills me with dread, so apart from a little cropping and lightening/darkening if a photo isn't any good when it comes off the camera there's nothing I can do to save it. The other problem is I worry that the story in my head, and that comes out in my shots, isn't the same as the story in anyone else's. I worry that the photos I take will be boring for everyone else. So one of the reasons it took me so long to edit this batch was that I spent hours staring at each one wondering if this is what he, the customer wants. That I haven't asked for anything in return, let alone money, doesn't render an affirmative answer to that question any less important. I really don't want to give him a pile of disappointing images. But what can I do, the photos I took are the photos I took?
Carter is of course best known for his time with Miles and playing with Tony Williams, but there's so much other good stuff out there. I particularly like his playing with drummers who have a broader cymbal beat than Tony had - particularly when he played with Elvin on such celebrated albums as 'Speak No Evil', 'The Real McCoy' and 'Trident'. I've heard anecdotally that Elvin and Ron didn't get on well on a personal level, which may explain why their recordings together are not extensive (I can't think of any live albums of them together - maybe someone can put me straight?), but any time they played together the feel is just great - Elvin's turbulent yet laid back forward motion works so well with Ron's springy certainty.
Prevacid for babies is a mix of a solutab and a solution. The two things have to be compounded by the pharmacy. Following the Prevacid coming home, it must always be refrigerated. For the best efficacy, it should be administered 2 times a day, 12 hours apart and a half hour before feeding. BUT. When Barrett took the very same meds, we noticed that even though the script was meant for 4 weeks, the intended outcome seemed to be reduced. It's like this.
2 cups whole milk, heated to foaming around the edges but not boiling - about 140 degrees
use the baseline shift to raise or lower dashes, slashes, parentheses, brackets, etc. to be optically centered around the type instead of on the same baseline.
- all the other card and papers came from the snippets folder including the white card as I never throw a single scrap away!
You are everywhere I look
Her neighbour Peter loves maps – mostly because they all lead away from this small town he is trapped in. Born on the day of his mother’s death, bookish and quiet Peter doesn’t relate to his sports-loving, beer-drinking, poker-playing town sheriff of a father. He works hard with a goal to apply for a good college, but more importantly, a college far away from where he is so that he and his father don’t have to live their awkward, stilted existence any longer. When Emma calls him requesting help on her road trip, he doesn’t hesitate to join her, if they can visit a few places he wants to see too.
No, I have a small boy, he is a Berliner, he speaks German.
To be honest my first impulse was to call a sympathetic Times reporter. He said he was going to see if he could spin a story out of it. Apparently his editors told him it wasn’t news.
“I wasn’t going to mention this so soon, but have a way to get a lot of money in Hobbington,” said Hermel. “I plan to use the money to have a poison made in Hobbington that will knock a man out. I intend to hire archers so that we can follow the bandits after we trade the hostages for the village’s spring seed, and have the archers knock the bandits out so we can take the seed back. That’s the least deadly way to handle the situation – and the most effective,” he said to Hormel earnestly.
3. Drapery fabric: Zen (46205); Nobilis.
"And how do you say 'creamed cheese?'" I asked.
I have food guilt. Not the guilt from having eaten too much food. The guilt of knowing that food is going bad in my fridge RIGHT NOW! I really hate throwing fruits and veggies in the compost because I waited too long to use them. But sometimes I can’t keep up with my own kitchen.
As a former circus ape who has hobnobbed with a number of virtuoso knife-throwers, I would venture to opine that the doctor is talking codswallop. There is a world of difference between hurling a projectile with pinpoint accuracy and reshaping a woman’s melons. Anyone who thinks that the skills are interchangeable is suffering from a bizarre delusion – the product, no doubt, of unbridled egomania in the doctor’s case. A man with that kind of overconfidence might be tempted into dangerous stunts on safari. It certainly wouldn’t help our cause if a world-famous cosmetic surgeon got his balls chewed off by a baboon.
Mistake #1: Because Old Dog hates writing checks to the kids (because they hang onto them for months before cashing them) I put cash in the card.
He was looking at our last name, too. ”That looks familiar,” he said. ”Not a common last name. Where have I seen that before?” I told him, “Well, we’ve had lots of dealings with CHOC with some of our other kids . . .” He pointed to Finn, who was sitting in his stroller through the proceedings. ”Him?” the doctor asked. ”Yes, he’s been here to the hospital a time or two.” ”Oh?” he said. ”Well, he has Down syndrome . . .” I said. ”Yes, I can see that!” He said. ”So what’s he been in for? Heart disease? Leukemia?” Asshole.
Last night I was involved in some surprise party skullduggery for my mate Tim’s 40th Birthday. His partner Sarah had been in touch asking if I would pretend to book him for a gig in London alongside Sound Of Rum and Monky (who were all in on the set up). He brought it completely and was pleasantly shocked when he turned up to find out that all his mates who had said they were too busy to come down to the gig (and a whole lot more) were all waiting for him. Although he was rather disappointed at not actually getting to play.
He's doing this to raise money for two good educational causes: Redlands in Tower Hamlets and a number of schools in Nachingwea, Tanzania. You can join the IPKat and others by making your donations here: www.justgiving.com/justinwatts. Merpel says, er, I think this event is supposed to be "rowing", not "rowing".
When I think of France, it is science and mathematics that comes to mind. The list of French scientists is much too long to be contained in one blog post. I also think of Paris, which is the greatest city on earth.
10 High Knee, 10 Mountain Climber (equals 1!): 2/3/3
Overall the New Old Lompoc is an awesome little pub. The beers lack the refinement of other microbreweries in the nieghborhood, but are unique, cheap, and enjoyable. The atmosphere is authentic, smoky, comfortable, Portland. I think it's exactly the grail Mcmenemin's trys to achieve in some of their pubs. The food is spectacular pub fare.
You know says Cody you really should get him a walker.
Or major corporate density method.
I have now managed to get my hands on a copy of Wonder Boys and am thoroughly looking forward to reading it.
There have been quite a few digital album deals I have had to pass on due to insufficient time to locate, assemble, and upload images to a site and then organize said images into a digital album (not much on the auto-fill option as I am a bit of a perfectionist).
commits a general intent crime when the stalker intends the actions in which he engages. In states
2) The Israelis have at their disposal –and use– a variety of methods to punish the Palestinians, from bombing their power plants to targetedly killing their leaders (and a few bystanders in the process) to impeding the import of food and clothing. The only way the Palestinians have of exacting a price for the Israelis’ crimes is to randomly kill civilians. Again, this is not to excuse those killings; it’s simply to compare the many retaliatory options the Israelis enjoy with the only one the Palestinians have. Give them planes, choppers and the most powerful army in the Middle East and they will probably do other, less disgusting things, such as blacking out Tel Aviv, killing 120 policemen at a graduation ceremony or using Israeli minors as human shields.
"Did you get the Better Half in yet?"
The main reason I picked up this beer in the first place was fact that it was a Black Lager (I mean, how frequently do you get the opportunity to drink a black lager?). After reviewing doing a through review, the fact that it was a black lager turned out to be the least interesting thing about the beer! More interesting to me was the acronym GYO which paraded prominently around the circumference of the label. GYO stands for Grow Your Own and proudly proclaims that this beer in it's entirety is a product of the Rogue Brewing Company...
In His Name we overcome
A whistle for dogs,
Unlike in South Africa, they are not yet the majority, but their numbers grow every day, there are certainly more of them than our government admit, and they are not here out of love for us.
I’m trying my hardest and my very best to be good.
If you have yet to hear them yourself, MySpace currently offers five samples. And if you check back here on Sunday there should be a Playgirl mp3 waiting for download!
Deveney's of Dundrum, we now have not one but two bottles for sale.
I think I did pretty good...I can't count that high ;)
I love the intense flavor of a fruit curd. Lemon and lime tops the list because they are the tangiest and I love me some tang! I had a bag of blood oranges and since they can be tart, I thought they would be a shoe in for a delicious tart curd. The result was delicious and delicate not the tangy curd I had expected. It had more of a creamy orange flavor. I was not completely happy with this curd, although it was quite good. The second time I made it, I added the juice of a lemon. This brightened the blood orange flavor and gave it the citrusy tangy edge that I craved. It was creamier and smoother than a lemon or lime curd but it had the balance of flavor I was looking for.
I'm thinking good old scaffold bars will do the job, but seeing as after the festival we'll have a marquee, bar and stillage for ale, we'll be advertising an outdoor bar service, specialising in real ale but I've also got a flash cooler with a few taps. With this in mind it's going to have to look a little neater. As for the bar itself, we'll probably use scaffolding boards (those thick wooden planks) on top of a metal frame, then staple something on top to make it look like a bar.
The Romans
Have you heard the one about the Christian fundamentalist and the approaching hurricane? Well, if you have, you’ll just have to bite your lip and think about something else like grilled cheese sandwiches or the steps involved in mitosis because it’s the controlling metaphor for this blog post, and I can’t start without telling it. So here we go….
Me: Yeah - I guess it wouldn't.
3. Which of the following has been linked to the highest increased risk of lung cancer?
Now I’m writing again and I’m a shade wiser than I was before. I think. I hope.
So I got to thinking, why not start a little feature on Sundays where I share some of the funny stuff I found during my week?
When you think of all the other pointless wars that have been fought since 1815 one can easily understand that the trillion sterling, obscene as it is, is almost certainly a serious underestimate which the usurers allow the UK elites to get away with as a special favour because "after all, they *have* been so accommodating over the centuries".
You know how when you’re tired, out of it, and look like crap, you just don’t feel like talking to anyone? Well, when I walked into Lulu, I found the cutest Gina working there, and she quickly put me out of my mood : )
situation and promised to
Stage one was merely to draw in key features in ultramarine blue diluted with thinner so it would dry quickly.
Having a glasse of blessings standing by;
may the clay dance
@saddet The romance of literary madness is something that's gotten radically less interesting to me as I've gotten older.
“The leadership chain-of-command is like a tree full of monkeys. When you look from the top down, you see a bunch of smiling faces. When you look from the bottom up, the perspective’s a little different.”
Would it have been so difficult to provide readers a proper contrary viewpoint? Apparently, yes. Because the opposition only gets this standard line, which while true it is really not working for us at all:
Anna loves nature; always has. I love that about her. She's always picking up flower petals. She holds them and treats them like gold. She's never grown out of the wonder of nature. She's so happy walking through a park; makes me wonder about her birth family in China.
Publication Date: May 2, 2011
First and foremost, choose a nicely marbled piece of meat. This will enhance the flavor of your pot roast like nothing else. Generously salt and pepper your chuck roast.
As a part of the Gateway National Recreation Area in the most remote area of Queens (if not arguably the whole city), Riis Landing is best known for its Colonial style Coast Guard station, built in 1937. It sits in the middle of Breezy Point peninsula, a residential area once dotted with shipwreck rescue stations. Now owned by the National Park Service, the ferry terminal was recently upgraded in anticipation of the mayor's announcement; however it's still surrounded by many unused buildings.
"Can you get our waitress?"
We met up with the other girls, one so sick from the weekend, that she was wrapped up in a blanket plus her coat and layers, but as she said… she just couldnt miss this. We walked… onto 18th Street, where we knew we’d be able to make a left and walk the next approximately 2 miles to get to our destination. The funny thing was that as much as we knew we’d see an influx of people… we didnt really KNOW until we saw. This picture can’t even begin to describe how many people we saw.
Mouse laughed and said “Even I was a tiger before marriage”
Sunchokes, Jerusalem artichokes, whatever they are--and I'm still not totally sure, since the definition in my beloved Larousse Gastronomique that my brother-in-law Philip gave me for Hannukah a couple of years ago is maddeningly vague--I love them. I want to write haikus to them, or perhaps a symphony in praise of them.
“It’s not about me – it’s about him telling the TRUTH. I lived close enough to USAF Fairford to shudder at the nightly whine of B52s taking off from the 51st state to attack a sovereign country on the dodgy dossier and murder of Dr David Kelly. I’m a Probation Officer (well ex-) so Truth and Justice are what makes me tick…”
beans are ready and delicious steamed or stir fried
He added: ‘But we’re approaching peak vagina on television, the point of labia saturation.’
I’m looking forward to home, and my family and friends and dogs and places where I can sit in the middle of the woods and hear birds. I’m looking forward to that so much. But I’m also… tentatively….looking forward to Florence. And even Tallahassee. And more adventures to come.
Parent fearlessly I say! Do what feels right and give the type of treatment you wish you received as a child (not trying to pick on our parents of course).
Women are called girls.
Voice Call: razor-sharp metal chink notes; also gives some lean, lispy paperwork and an energized, squealing sequence of paperwork, often provided as a duet by a couple. Song: Increasing chink paperwork with stutters in the center.
1 1/2 boneless skinless chicken breasts cut into 2-3″chunks
Anyhoo... I hope you've been having a great summer too! Tell me about it in the comments please.
The main character, Lenny, is not your typical teenager. She takes good care of herself, studies hard and even has a mild case of OCD when it comes to cleanliness. Because of this, her best friend, Anna, believes her when says that there's a monster stalking her. The two then set out to find out who, or what, has been stalking Lenny and to try and stop it. The dynamic between Lenny and Anna was jealousy inducing. They have a tight bond and their constant banter and bickering was so much fun to read. Anna, who is smart, witty and obsessed with a certain oblivious football player was possibly my favorite character. Even in the face of death, this girl was still going to look her best and be her flirtiest just in case her crush happens to notice.
Now that we've covered some ground on spinning singles, what makes these special? I followed all my guidelines above, definitely. They are a nice, low-twist single. But there are two other things about these singles that make them unique in my own spinning history.
Remember to link up your entries to be in for the chance at gift vouchers and Guest DT spots...
“Oh!” Eyes diverted, brain cranking out different excuses for why the conversation should end now, or how to make a clean transition into something completely unrelated.
Here's my bumpersticker summation: Peace isn't compliance. It's concordance.
Since 2009, police arrested more than 100 people on prostitution-related charges in jurisdictions along Interstate 376 between the city of Pittsburgh and Pittsburgh International Airport in Findlay, according to statistics from police in Moon, Robinson and Carnegie. Departments in Findlay, Green Tree and North Fayette said they’ve also noticed the gift card trend. “It’s becoming more difficult to find cash on them,” North Fayette police Chief Jeffrey Falconer said. Gift cards, sometimes called stored-value cards, easily are obtained and can be reloaded with amounts of money, McCarthy said. Visa, MasterCard and American Express issue the most popular types, he said…”The ones we’re working are still using cash, but (gift cards) may be next the next trend,” Findlay police Chief Jesse Lesko said. ”They don’t like to give up the $5,000 or $6,000 they earned over a weekend.”
We'll just have to keep peering behind those musty old book covers.
2. Van Dyke Parks - Bing Crosby
There are some great patterns available, and I think ones with bolder patterns would be particularly good as accent nails. I liked this one by Butter London because it looked unique. They are easy enough to apply (peel off the sheet, stick onto the nail, cut/buff away the excess, apply a topcoat) but I personally found they did not lay flat on my nail bed - probably because my nails are very curved. I didn't even bother photographing my nails because they looked so bad. They should last for a couple of days but I always took mine off after one day because pieces of fluff would be caught on the edges. All in all, not for me.
Disclaimer: I have never attempted to do any ballroom dancing nor have taken part in any pornographic films. The analogy is based merely on my own observations.
Because God has given us that honour to help His cause, bringing His kingdom here:
I apologize for the quality.
This recipe uses Demerara, similar to turbinado, cassonade or Hawaiian washed sugar, which is darker and coarser than cane sugar and adds a treacly dimension. It is in no way intended to be a definitive version. Marmalade, I’ve realized, is a very personal thing and everyone has their peccadilloes – thick cut or thin, syrupy, solid, wobbly, astringent, ladled over ice cream, eaten only at night etc. In other words, marmalade is a minefield. So with that in mind, I tentatively ask you to please consider this version. And we’ll hopefully leave it at that.
When the days get rough, when you look at your artwork or novel or musical composition and you think that nothing else has ever stunk worse than it has, we need encouragement. Most of the time, we need to find that encouragement from within ourselves. Other times, our well has run dry and we need to rely on others.
The sound of rushed footsteps and hushed voices
Veteran author Sneed Collard offers young readers an affecting, realistic portrait of an adolescent boy who must learn to cope with conflicts and challenges in an unfamiliar environment and to accept changes in his life that are beyond his control.
“We have worked with the sheriff’s department for weeks to identify weapons not related to any crime,” said Ysassi, who inherited the property room when he took office following the 2008 election. “So people can now come to our office and request them back.”
Over the weekend I started a pair of two at time toe-up socks in Wendy Knits' pattern Seaweed. I'm getting addicted to these toe-up sock patterns lately. Using Pagewood Farms Yukon in Navajo colorway. I know I said I wasn't doing giftmas knitting this year, but I make my mother something knitted every Christmas.
It is great projects which includes upgrades, installations and wireless networking, and I am loving every minute of it!
Wishing all of you a very special Christmas season .
It could be an exquisite and tasteful alternative to lingerie on your wedding night and continue to be a gorgeous nightgown for your newlywed life ... I also think it could create an amazing look as a swimsuit cover-up on your honeymoon - paired with metallic sandals, chunky turquoise jewelry and hints of a bright bikini peeking through ... It also transforms magnificently as a dress for cocktails at sunset - just pop it over a dressy top and slip and use a skinny belt to cinch the waist and voila, you have a gorgeously-updated-vintage look!
I was walking through Market Cross shopping centre a few days ago and found myself lured into a shop by a glamorous young lady. She then sat painting her nails while the kids and I stared at a dozen tanks of titchy fish that raced around looking for their missing lunch. My wife's tough jogging feet sprang to mind and I bought her a gift voucher - because she's worth it.
However a detour road goes around the flooded area and crosses the creek by a punt. It is a novelty for the punt to work as the creek is usually dry. The plane had been flying very low so we could get a good view of the wetlands.
Please get in touch if you’d like to be part of TT2012 – I’d love to hear from you!
two oven mitts or pot holders
Some have already voiced their disagreement, saying we should repair or reduce the budget.
Meanwhile, heat a drizzle of olive oil in a medium skillet. Add the onions and season with salt. Cook on medium hi for 5 minutes. Remove the sausage from their casings and crumble into skillet. (Save the other 2 sausage links for pasta or add them to a salad) Break up sausage with a wooden spoon, add the garlic, and reduce heat to medium. Cook for 3 minutes.
I’ve searched everywhere and are not
As already noted, Brettanomyces yeasts also play a role in the fermentation of English beer types "ale" and "Stout". Maturation does not, as with "lambic", take place in bottles but only in barrels. However, these are also bottled unfiltered. I examined samples bottled in this country of "Pale Ale" and "Stout" from Bass & Co., Brewers, Burton on Trent. For isolation of Brettanomyces strains from these samples a portion of the sediment was swabbed on malt agar and chalk plates and yeast-agar-glucose and chalk plates, which were incubated at 30° C.
I finally got around to watching a few episodes of Sarah Palin's Alaska the other night, and to tell you the truth its hard for me to fault Kate Goslin's performance for her guest-starring stint on the show. If you have never watched the show and decide to give it a shot, let me give you some good advice. You are going to want to make sure you are as close as possible to a soft, comfortable bed with the thickest, warmest blanket you can find.
Yes, this museum features EXACTLY WHAT YOU THINK IT DOES. Hundreds of them, in fact, from every corner of the animal kingdom. Whales, seals, dogs, bulls, dolphins, cats, rats, bunnies, humans – you name it.
this new client is and all the possibilities I can bring to them.
Good morning (again!) It's time for another fun sketch from the gang at Tuesday Morning Sketches. I realized St. Patrick's Day is just around the corner, so I thought I should get busy and make some cards. I used one of my favorite standbys...Changito!
Begging him to know, to understand how much I love him. How he was the best, and that was not something that people just said- I meant it with every ounce of energy in my being.
The slogan “Forward!” reflected the conviction of European Marxists and radicals that their movements reflected the march of history, which would move forward past capitalism and into socialism and communism.
I loved the comments on my post about the anniversary of the death of my little son. Thank you all. I wanted to answer each of those comments because they were like little sympathy cards to me and meant a lot.
I simply could not stand Coldplay when I first heard them, and I wanted nothing more than for Chris Martin to shut the fuck up. I'd make a face every time my sister would play one of their songs. I'd change the radio station (this was back when I was still listening to radio) the minute I heard the opening bars of "Yellow." Then, "Clocks" and "The Scientist." I really couldn't stand them at all. And so, Coldplay was relegated to the "please don't make me listen to this" file and put away.
The woman who should be president has proven herself over 3 decades – ranking #1 or #2 throughout her 18 years as first lady, US senator and secy of state. The acting president who has been in politics for 13 years – nationally for 6 – became #1 only after he was elected.
** Switch to K hook.
YouTube is a great place to watch people fail in so many different and entertaining ways!!!
For example, a drug company wants to know if a particular medicine it wants to market will have undesirable side effects. To test whether headache might be a side effect, the null hypothesis is “this medicine will not result in headaches.” It gives the medicine to a selection of volunteers, and if it is followed by headaches, the company rejects the null hypothesis, and agrees to publish a warning that a side effect of the medicine may be headache. If nobody gets headaches, the company can only say “we have found no evidence that it causes headaches.” As we know, once a medicine is on the market, it is quite possible for evidence to emerge which does indeed result in the rejection of the null hypothesis which was that the drug has no known side effects
Flexibility and simplicity should be emphasized in order to promote compliance.
Based on that recommendation stipulates that both of you must be present if available. It has been said that he had a great interest in the initiative of the Arab League, and could be a suitable title for the talks.
There will be several free poker bankrolls available for every visitor. Make sure you come back and read our posts and how to qualify for free poker money.
Catalog#: REP 4598-WY
He's just what I've been waiting for Oh yeah
If we don’t we might as well lay down and die
Tools & Home Improvement Product Reviews Blog ZSVA (toolshomeimprovementzsva.wordpress.com) is a participant in the Amazon Services LLC and Amazon EU Associates Programmes designed to provide a means for sites to earn advertising fees by advertising and linking to amazon.com, amazon.ca, amazon.co.uk, amazon.de, amazon.fr, amazon.it and amazon.es. Certain content that appears on this website comes from Amazon Services LLC and/or Amazon EU. This content is provided “as is” and is subject to change or removal at any time.
1403 comments
He had brought heaps of those books back with him from Calcutta. He would read them in solitude, and he would day dream about, about what? This was when his father became ill, and with poverty looming, his mother made the request to take up the jute mill job. What would he do? What could he do? He couldn’t tolerate his parents’ suffering. So obviously he had to take up the jute mill job. But he also knew that this was not the subject of his dreams. A centre forward of football, the district champion in high jump, the famous swimmer Shankar, he would turn up as a clerk in a jute mill? Putting his rice and dal in the tiffin carrier, and a paan in a little box in the coat pocket, running to the mill every morning by the siren, back for a quick lunch at noon, then wait for the siren at six for the knock off time. He just couldn’t see himself in that life. His whole being was repelled by the very idea — a race stallion ending up pulling carts!… It was close to the evening. Sitting on the river bank, this is what Shankar was thinking. He wanted to sail off to some far away land, amidst danger, like Livingstone and Stanley, like Marco Polo and Robinson Crusoe. That is what he had prepared himself for since childhood. Of course, he had never thought that these could happen to men from other lands, not Bengal. Bengalis were brought up to be clerks, teachers, doctors or lawyers. For them, adventures in strange lands were just what you would read in books!
Another fellow missionary wrote a beautiful, meaningful tribute to Julie, a fallen hero, and the little MK, Timmy. Please, pray for Norberto and Anahi as they heal and deal with this new life. May God grant them his immeasurable grace in this time of such loss and need.
I got a nice pineapple aroma. No earthy notes like last time just the fruit notes. There was some bitterness in the first sip, but it feels like a different kind of bitterness from IPAs. I found this one to be really interesting. The hops interact with the base beer in a really different but good way and it's a nice change from other hopped up beers because of that.
As most of my friends know about me, they now three things:
You only see them at work, or college,
The Hopi tribes and others wore masks while curing and praying over the sick, to alleviate suffering and pain, and to perform exorcisms. Some tribes believed that sickness was caused by malevolent or evil spirits. The Nepcetat mask was worn by the Shaman to predict death. It was literally stuck to the face of the Shaman, if it stayed on during the prayer ritual it meant that the person being prayed for would recover and live. If it fell off during the prayer ritual it meant the person was near death.
Talking about sparkling, the postman brought me a wonderful surprise last week from the lovely bubbly and gorgeously beautiful Lean de Ruiter in Holland. I will soon share some of the content of this package with you. Her sweet and clever doggie Chippie had also sent a little something to her admirer in Stockholm; a card with a view of her beloved beach! Thank you so much girls!
The palate is fresh, lively and juicy, more sweet fruit than I had expected and loads of lovely freshness giving good acidity and balance. Silky well integrated tannins and lovely Sangiovese cherry, pomegranate fruit. Very long, clean and fresh finish with just a hint of drying tannins.
Cos now I’m lost
Here’s the latest version of the first Chemise dress that I made:
Integer and Floating-Point Conversions from “Programming in Objective-C 2.0: Second Edition”:
A little over a week ago, I was at the alumni night for the Los Angeles Urban Project, visiting the UCI students who were doing LAUP for the summer and connecting with other alumni from the program. The latter half of the evening had us split up into locations by where we live, or want to live (ie. in the inner city, overseas, or the suburbs). Being an Irvine resident in the heart of the OC, I naturally went to the seminar on the suburbs.
Goldy decides it is Crunch Time and jumps from the frying pan into the investigation of the fires and the murders. Can she stay one step ahead of the killer and keep herself from being their next victim?
What earthly circumstance can save her
In what can be termed as acute embarrassment to major media houses, a “Modi”fication of articles that were published, based on GDP of Gujarat state was done hurriedly. Today Business Standard, one of India’s leading newspaper, carried an article by AK Bhattacharya, with a set of figures that depict growth in Gujarat, trying to drive home a point that ‘growth of Gujarat is a myth’. Soon, other media houses like Rediff, and surprisingly the British Broadcasting Corporation joined the bandwagon. this resulted in print media splashing articles quoting the figures quoted by Business Standard. BBC even went to the extent of nailing Gujarat with a story titled “Is Gujarat’s Red Hot Economy a Myth?” But soon followed counter figures, with accurate proof, which put the very same media houses to shame. The article published byBusiness Standard quotes the GDP of Gujarat as 6.3%, where as the actual figures stood at a towering 10.08%.
Here's my project:
Their recycling insurance policies can provide cover towards other areas that might impact an agency while in the recycling and squander industry which include Residence, machines and Seed, open and Organisations Culpability, Environment Handicap, Professional Indemnity, Administrators & Authorities. Additionally, they can set up cover autos and transit challenges.
Smells Like Teen Spirit
And this is what I pay two fifty for every afternoon. The thing is that my wife and I are running pretty tight on money. She just started a new semester of school and I’m still waiting tables. I come here, sip a damn good cup of coffee and mooch the wifi for the next three hours, sending off my resume to the offices of all the lawyers and business execs I wait on every day. I ask them if they’d like a cup of soup with their salad, when I’d really like to ask them how it feels to provide health insurance for their wives.
Wow. Freedom.
* Stats tells me how many people have viewed my blog and where they came from (Facebook, another blogger and says what country they are from) It doesn't tell me who has been here. I only know who, if you leave a comment.
All you need to complete this project are:
Stoner
“Whoa! Where’d the cat come from?” Burnett entered, trying not to trip over the little grey kitten that was winding its way around his feet.
One of my favourite bits was the outdoor gardens, this year the theme was ‘small spaces’ (I have to say their idea of small was a bit different to mine, they were definitely free range size, my garden is more a battery hen size) One of these ‘small’ gardens was called The Writers Pad, which was a decking area, some shelves with books on them, a seat with a bench for a laptop and a water feature. The idea being it was meant to provide inspiration for writers.
Out visit started with a guided tour, where we were welcomed by our guide Ropetahonekihimitataupopoki iharaira piripi; Robert to you and I. He talked us through a short history of the village, explained that the tribe is all one family, and inside the complex should be thought of as their home, so once we stepped through the gates we became guests in their home. Although he now lives on a farm beyond the village boundaries, Robert grew up in the complex and his face lit up as he told us stories of a happy childhood playing amongst the hot water and mud pools, finding ways to make pocket money and running around plastered in mud, scaring tourists. He explained that many of the houses these days house the older members of their community, who had lived there all their lives, and were accustomed to living with the steam, so wouldn’t adapt well to a life with everyday mod cons like ovens and showers.
What she is doing is stressing - to the point of sobbing, sometimes - over the guilt she feels about thinking something bad about someone. Not SAYING it, mind you...just THINKING about it. For like two weeks she has cried multiple times per day about death. Why? Because she is terrified that if she thinks about someone dying, it must mean she WANTS them to die, and what if they DID die, and what if she CAUSED them to die by THINKING about them dying, and boo hoo hoo hoo!
The weather gets warm enough for me to emerge from my winter hibernation, and I disappear from the modern world at least every other day. Ice fishing for lake trout and arctic char, trips to the tree line to gather alder bark and cotton tree buds, and general driving around in the melting arctic watching what the animals may be doing. The sound of chittering squirrels and singing snow birds always makes one smile and laugh.
As I opened the butterfly house today to let them go, one of my little girls yelled, "I'm not ready!"
31 Chrome - Critical Mass
breath of my infant,
This tool also allows one to browse through the documents and the security measures allow viewing restrictions.
No such luck. Her eyes twinkling, she sang out, "Rel and Taslin, sitting in a tree-"
Today we headed off bright and EARLY for his first day. He has three boys, favorite friends from kindergarten, in his class plus some of the girls he is friends with. He's sitting next to two of the boys and back to back with the other, so he's thrilled. The mom's have already warned them that friends get separated if they talk while the teacher is talking! The kids were all a-buzz with their new desks and their supplies all set up for them. Very cute. I didn't cry, but it does seem like he's growing up fast. Sniff, sniff!
He saw his new son Michael for half an hour in Crumpsall hospital, and then caught the next train back to Kirkham. But as he dodged through a well-worn hole in the camp hedge, he noticed that huge lorries full of men were leaving in convoy. When he got back to the mess, Dad found his mates busily stuffing meagre possessions into kitbags.
2. All I’ll ever have is a small glimpse into what is eternally True.
Again, opinion is divided elsewhere - but a well-deserved victory for the beer overall.
I have a wonderful husband with whom I can be 'myself'.
Further Links
PROVE these things don’t just say them PROVE THEM PROOF IS EVERYTHING. Most the things you said in your last post could have proof easily found yet still you don’t use it that is my point to you you need TO USE EVIDENCE. Look it up on google it is pretty easy.
Contestant: Iceland? Ireland?
Chris walked to the door and had the same trouble as at Ann’s house. Another barrier, although weak, was there. He popped through it, stumbling in, and Ann followed easily.
A senior ANC leader also criticised the judges, suggesting they had acted improperly in issuing a public statement instead of referring the matter to the JSC. “The NEC (national executive committee) has not discussed the matter, but it leaves a bad taste. We are talking and the thinking is there is no independence in the judiciary and maybe we should consider regulating (the judiciary),” he said.
and flesh of my flesh;
- St. Francis of Assisi
Another role he expected Bâri′, obediently, to play.
I’m in the middle of three books right now, and have no more shelf space, but I couldn’t resist. I had the first two on my must-read list, the second two just looked fantastic and the last one was on the sale table. Besides, I was in one of my favorite bookstores, McNally Robinson and they were carrying Paris, My Sweet.
Really hope it's going to be fine when she gets up but considering she has refused to move her arm since 3pm and even in her sleep is not moving it I have a feeling we will be taking a trip to ER
There were women sitting around with lots of light-weight colourful plastic pots. I asked them where the water was going to arrive from and they said they were waiting for electricity. The villages have one or more large cylindrical tanks painted with pictures of goddesses, often by the roadside, about 8ft high and I’ve often seen people filling water at these. They were waiting beside one of these now. There were guys at the chai stall and the usual barrage of questions followed. There were some new ones as well. No, it’s not solar powered. Yes, you have to pedal it all the way.
'I wonder what I did to deserve being
Much of the controversy of MT stems from it being a “talking therapy”, as opposed to a physical or drug based therapy, and the idea that words alone might be able to affect a physical condition can seem nonsensical. Indeed, it seems to imply the illness is “all in the mind” or, at worst, even a false illness belief.
If you ask me, this is far too good to pass up:
Both "The Purple Rose of Cairo" and "The Paris Wife" were recommended to me by my sister. I guess I've been busy snoozing under a rock, because I was unfamiliar with both.
My kind friends at Brenfield Farm and Argyll Trail Riding allowed me to ride their horse Brenfield Alfie in a national TREK Qualifier competition held on their estate last weekend. Alfie and I have been getting to know eachother for some time now and I ride him a few times a week. He's an old chap at 22, but still looking in superb condition. He's a school master who is the perfect confidence builder since he takes such care of whoever is on board. However he knows all the tricks of the trade when it comes to getting his own way and is just a tad lazy!
But today was long. Apparently I have signs of carpal tunnel but I knew that would happen some day. There is a tight tendon between my thumb and pointer finger that hurts every now and again. From the rain today my right breast hurts from where I had surgery almost 2 years ago this August. It still hurts every now and again. I had a second cup of coffee and 3pm that has my eyes still wide awake. Paying bills after a $400 car repair stings a lil but it's okay for now. However a brief late night call of "Goodnight baby" made me smile despite it all.
Off to grab a crying baby! Thanks for the kind words so far everyone :)
Strain the milk mixture through a cheesecloth or very fine sieve to remove any solids and stir in the honey. Let the mixture come to room temperature, then cover with plastic wrap and refrigerate overnight.
Based on Scripture, those “millions of Christians who think Brown is wrong” are wrong. This isn’t an issue decided by popular vote. The majority of people in Alabama could vote and pass a resolution indicating that I’m seven feet tall, but I’m not (sorry to disappoint you). Every person in the whole world could think Brown is wrong, but they would also be wrong.
I will become a promotional product girl.
So now we’ve got the silent thing going on again. Oh, he did lower himself to asking me where the granola was, but he wouldn’t actually acknowledge me when I gave it to him.
Ornament my parents gave me for Christmas, other side says 2011:
Thoughts? You don't have to like it. I can dig it. But I'd like to move in a more contemporary direction, you know?
Today's winner is...
The show features a diverse line-up of Northeast ska and reggae bands including The Shifters from Washington DC who are a female-fronted 8-piece playing 60's inspired rocksteady and skinhead reggae, the old school 2-Tone ska of my band Bigger Thomas, Silver Dollar from New Brunswick NJ who combine ska, jazz, reggae, blues, rocksteady, funk and soul together and Princelionsound who performs as a Sound System styled DJ. And if that's not enough ska entertainment for you, the show features Rudies Don't Care with Jah Point and Tommi Infamous (ex-Bomb Town) on the decks.
Ever since trading for Carmelo Anthony last season there has been high expectations from New York, but they have fail to perform to their highest abilities. They started the 2012 season as one of the worse teams in the NBA until asian sensation Jeremy LIn took over the point guard position and helped push them into the playoffs. They were so excited to finally have a point guard to go along with their big 3 of Tyson Chandler, Carmelo Anthony, and Amare Stoudemire, but a little bit before the playoffs started Lin hurt his knee and hasn’t played since.
Under the Trust’s rural livelihoods portfolio, support is provided to a range of non-government organisations (NGOs) whose focus is on implementing livestock based livelihood projects throughout India. Generally speaking however, the Trust’s initiatives with these NGOs have required professional support in their planning and implementation, thus providing the premise for the partnership between the Tata-Trust and ILRI. Under the partnership, ILRI in consultation with various partners provides assistance in identifying the relevant policy, technical or institutional gaps, whilst also providing on-the-ground support in the actual implementation of the projects.
of each of the eight illustrated girls
Yves Rocher was bright and illuminated. The store always looked clean and items weren’t crammed together as to be overwhelming. The salesladies always seemed very professional – I only later realized that it was because Yves Rocher also offers spa services. I’ve never tried any myself, but I loved their Les Plaisirs body washes and lotions – they all smelled fruity! There was coconut, mango, vanilla, apricot, pear… so delicious! But the smells were never so overpowering that I would cough when I smelled the products. So any products I bought were usually the shower gels and body lotions. I’ve used up a good number of them, too. The shower gels smelled great and were non-irritating – I used them as a shaving gel, as well. The body lotions were moisturizing without feeling heavy. I can’t stress enough how good everything smelled! I even bought their body sprays, but later realized I didn’t necessarily want to walk around all day smelling like a pear.
The Democrats’ main defense against accusations of administration cronyism is that Solyndra applied for the Energy Department loan as part of a program created by the Bush administration. Memos prepared by the Republican and Democratic staffs of the House Energy and Commerce committee said Solyndra first applied for an Energy Department loan in 2006. Its plan to build a factory to manufacture a new kind of solar technology was one of 16 projects chosen from about 140.
I got myself depressed being alone, crying and screaming in pillows.
But my health took a lead role with my back issues and surgery.
A poem can be red, black or blue –
We have all, at some point in life, related with the first mother. But it is not where we should stay. If we are not defined as women as God's word lays out for us. We are wasting our lives. And any fulfillment we reap, will not be eternal. Being a woman of God, is a beautiful thing. Being a momma at home, is a glorious thing!!! Every small job means something!! But you must look to the Lord to define what that looks like. And when you do, you will experience joy unspeakable and full of glory!!!
Career education planning is necessary and students can seek professional advice on career education from counselors of various career forums and programs. They can also take advice from their friends and family members who are able to easily ascertain their aptitude and interests.
The terrified holidaymakers sought shelter in a tree while the father of the family called the police.
This success will translate into growth for many of these local wineries. Some of their plans include expanding grape & fruit production, increasing wine production, hiring additional employees, purchasing additional equipment and more. So the financial benefits will accrue to others as well, as healthy businesses contribute to local economies. Hopefully, these wineries will participate even more in farmers' markets and agricultural events in 2012, and will earn even greater income.
Lo, children are an heritage of the LORD: and the fruit of the womb is his reward.
As I write this, I do so with great pains in my heart because I know that God has given intelligence in equal measure to all his children irrespective of the colour of their skin. The problem with us black people is that we have refused to use our intelligence to organise ourselves socially and politically.
I must just remember that
‘We firmly believe that the transmitter has become detached.’
He’s mainly talking about the Apple TV everyone out of their right mind is expecting to hit the market within the next few months, but he’s also making blanket statements like
Predictably, all ended up fine. I got to my destination, the university, to meet some friends, was chaperoned out of the bus and only let go after it became clear that I had indeed regained consciousness and knew where I needed to go. Now, several hours later, I sit at an Arab cafe next to the uni, with a milk coffee and a pastry, feeling quite jolly. But something about this experience struck me. Although I had witnessed quite a few wacky things on public transport around the globe before today (including an exhibitionist in France, a tearful break-up in the US and sadistic German bus drivers who close the bus door just in front of your nose after you ran half a mile to make the last bus), but never had I seen what the Transmilenio offered me this morning: an intense loss and subsequent return of human empathy within an hour or so. And I am glad to say that I can count on my fellow Bogotanians. Well… at least the J70 crowd.
Hmm…
Think that not winning, or being placed, or being rejected is a sign that your story’s rubbish or that you’re not good enough. Yes, it’s true, sometimes stories aren’t anywhere near good enough, but of all I’ve rejected a huge number have been brilliant and simply haven’t quite turned me on as much as the winner. It’s a matter of judgement – simply someone’s opinion. So please, don’t be disheartened. If your story hasn’t got anywhere, have another look at it, see if you can make it any better, and send it somewhere else – there are plenty of other wonderful places where it could find a home.
DRB would be able to consolidate and expand its share of Malaysia automotive market with a Proton acquisition, TA Securities’ Ratnam said. DRB manufactures, distributes and assembles a range of vehicles from motorcycles to garbage trucks for brands including Suzuki, Mercedes-Benz and Yamaha. It has eight assembly plants of which four are for cars, including one in Malaysia’s southern Malacca state where Hondas are made.
Till now, Writer Beware has pretty much ignored The Write Agenda. We feel no need to defend ourselves against anonymous groups with obvious hate agendas. Also, despite its best efforts, TWA hasn't succeeded in attracting much attention, so we don't feel that its fractured logic is much of a threat to new authors. Plus, it's kind of hard to take seriously a group whose logo is a guy with a bag over his head, or that creates a website called BadReads devoted to posting bad reviews of its critics' books, or claims that criticizing literary scams leads to low Amazon sales rankings. (Do they also think that kissing leads to pregnancy?)
The app also contains 11 unique portals - special interactive entries, for the Doctor, Amy, Rory, River and other major characters. The Doctors’ portal uses parallax technology which allows users to move their iPad to scroll through a 3D environment, featuring the Doctor’s closest companions and deadliest enemies.
I wish I could just enjoy this:
I saw so many people this weekend with the same goal in mind - finding a cure for breast cancer. I walked with a woman on my team who was diagnosed with breast cancer last October and has gone through chemo, radiation, surgery, etc ALL while training TO WALK THE 3 DAY! She walked all 60 miles and was smiling, laughing and SERVING several other women on my team along the way!
Though the breathy heat that falls from your lips is so far from cold lust
Trent looked into the darkness and thought of their vehicles sitting out in the open and vulnerable to sabotage. Screw the cars. “Where did they come from, that’s what we need to find out. Come on.”
A small window OPENS.
3-Master our lips are sealed
11:02 a.m. — Grains steeping at in 3 quarts of 158°F water for 30 minutes.
#1 Me wearing Rainbow Color lenses in Earth Brown by Cheesie. I'm thinking on making a review on the lenses, so I pray hard that my hardworking mood comes faster. It doesn't comes yet wtf.
When preparing to speak at a plenary session, one must pick an issue on which to speak, then prepare a concise statement on it. The next step is to be early at the conference hall, get on the list of speakers, and find a seat with access to a microphone. There is a time limit of three or even two minutes per speaker, and violating that limit is generally frowned upon. Being concise is crucial, and quite useful as well. Three sharp points delivered in 90 seconds can make a much clearer impact than ten points pushed into three or four minutes of speaking time. A prepared, written statement can be handed over for the translators to use, that the statement gets translated into various non-English languages. English remains the main language of OSCE events, and since all presentations are translated to English or from English to other languages. Foreign language skills are not required to work effectively at OSCE events.
That sent us on a crash course of congenital heart defects
The Poster Ad campaign sensation would revert to one of high tolerance indeed; with one generation believing it is just another poster and the older generation’s collective heads doing a 360 degree swirl. The key to comments abounding social media would still be what is the issue; the nudity, the interracial or the same-sex component? My sense is the South Africans may well still be hang up on the nudity first! Or am I dreaming?
My mum and dad are on a road trip through France. They arrived here 9 days ago and it's been great to see them. They went on their way this morning and, as usual, I feel sad and a little bit lost. They have another week and will be slowly making their way home. I hope the weather picks up a little for them. The forecast is good.
Yes, ladies and gentlemen, that is a ductless A/C unit (you have to use ductless if your house has rads / hot water heating instead of forced air). Goodbye window air conditioners; this puppy will keep us cool in the summer. It's at the top of our stairs and the idea is that it will cool the air upstairs, and the cool air will fall to cool the main floor. We don't need the house freezing in the summer but this will definitely add to comfort when it's hot and humid outside. The Mr. is PRETTY excited about it (and so am I).
Robot mode: FE 9, RID 6
Few seem to joke any more. Indeed, the last time anyone laughed out there was over the memorable headline “BANANA CHARGED WITH SODOMY” (relating to the Reverend Canaan Banana and his alleged proclivities). Zimbabwe was just the latest African state to squander its potential, to swap civil society for civil strife and pile high its corpses. Then the wrecking virus moves on and a fresh spasm of violence erupts elsewhere. Congo, Ivory Coast, Sudan, Rwanda, Sierra Leone, even Kenya. Take your pick, for it is the essence of Africa, the recurring A-Z of horror. And as surely as Nelson Mandela took those steps from captivity to freedom, his own country will doubtless shuffle into chaos and ruin.
The retired officer said that he became wary of travelling to Dundalk Garda station. Like murdered Superintendent Bob Buchanan, Witness X said that it had been his practice to travel to Dundalk in his own car, mostly alone, but sometimes with a second RUC officer.
Method for egg whites:
While I can't say Babycakes took right to the bottle, I can say we had more success with the Lansinoh mOmma Bottle than with others we've tried. At this point, I was happy when I came home last week to hear he had drank an ounce and a half from the bottle. In past weeks, he had drank nothing, or had to be spoon fed pumped milk.
4. Radically redesign land reform
Those in the citadel released the hostages to Jonathan, and he gave them back to their parents.
The service was very friendly, cheerful and efficient.
In one classic 1993 study, women with cervical dysplasia or abnormal Pap smears were treated by naturopaths with topical applications of herbs and dietary supplements. These medications included Bromelian, an enzyme from the pineapple; bloodroot; marigold; zinc chloride; and suppositories made from herbal and nutritional ingredients, such as echinacea, vitamin A, and vitamin E.
The title "essay" explains how to do the actual installation with a combination of technology and eldritch magic. Conceptually, this is a great idea, but if you've ever read a how-to on installing Linux, you know how dreadfully boring they are, and even changing Ubuntu to VuDu doesn't make it more readable. The essay is followed by numerous news articles and press releases that riff on the idea, such as teenage hacker gangs using their undead badgers for trouble with a capital T -- everything from sneaking webcams into sorority houses, to foiling Homeland Security's attempt to obtain library records (there are several topical political digs like that which are already looking dated and will undoubtedly confuse the hell out of anyone who reads this book in twenty years). These stories do create an interesting world, where necromantic technology allows corporations to "in-source" jobs to linux-zombies, but there's no narrative, and although they may've been amusing when they first appeared in magazines, collected together like this the joke gets tiresome.
And then has blown them away
2. Fold and glue together at both sides with a piece of tape
I am all knuckle and blood
Have this in mind when you consider PAS Ulama Council chief Harun Taib saying that if PAS emerges from the next elections as the party within the Pakatan Rakyat coalition that wins the largest number of seats, it will amend the constitution to introduce and implement hudud law.
Next is Woolacombe Sands by day:
9. Look for Recovery Act money that has not been spent at the state level: de-obligated funds.
Into voids
Cardstock Sky, Indian corn blue, & white daisy by CTMH
Makeup I was wearing in the above:
I've learned that I'm not a writer.
and cotyledon skinned,
6. The entire Sweet Valley series (from Sweet Valley kids to Sweet Valley High and every spin-off in between)
I’ll have a longer post, I’m sure, later on how the whole hotel experience went (hint: not as well as the car experience) but in summary, I thoroughly enjoyed the drive to Cincinnati and look forward to more road trip with the family in the future…as well as we sleep in the car instead of a hotel.
It turned out to be a ticket to jail.
Secondly, I really wish my local movie theater would do things like this more often. I would love to see some of the old classic B&W films (most of which, I am sad to say, I have never seen) up on the screen. Would it really kill them to do a monthly screening of something featuring Cary Grant, Audrey Hepburn, Danny Kaye, etc.
I am now obsessed with old photographs and early photographers like William Hayes that I mentioned in my last post. I have the book now by the way and what an interesting read it is. Loads of great pictures as well.
Therefore, in my opinion, anyone can write a good blog post. What you want to say is right there, at your fingertips. Show the world you're not afraid of the blogging police and make your blog stand out. If you want to follow blogging etiquette then do; but remember that if you don't, your blog is still as good as everyone else's. Because you're out there, doing what you feel is right and not what others feel is wrong.
I almost wrote this post 18 months ago but I was reminded by one of the bloggy that it was too soon. Time's right now, here goes; "it's tough keeping up with a blog, more than that it's work..!"
B’s logical list of animals he tried to search up on the sites he used
That’s it from me people. Hope you have a good week – until next time.
27. Somewhere in la Mancha, in a place whose name I do not care to remember, a gentleman lived not long ago, one of those who has a lance and ancient shield on a shelf and keeps a skinny nag and a greyhound for racing. —Miguel de Cervantes, Don Quixote (1605; trans. Edith Grossman)
It is precisely the exception that makes relevant the subject of sovereignty, that is the whole question of sovereignty. The precise details of an emergency cannot be anticipated, nor can one spell out what may take place in such a case, especially when it is truly a matter of extreme emergency and of how it is to be eliminated. The precondition as well as the content of jurisdictional competence in such a case must necessarily be unlimited. From the liberal constitutional point of view, there would be no jurisdictional competence at all. The most guidance the constitution can provide is to indicate who can act in such a case. If such action is not subject to controls, if it is not hampered in some way by checks and balances, as is the case in a liberal constitution, then it is clear who the sovereign is. He decides whether there is an extreme emergency as well as what must be done to eliminate it. Although he stands outside the normally valid legal system, he nevertheless belongs to it, for it is he who must decide whether the constitution must be suspended in its entirety."
So, this isn't news. That all men and women are created equal. That we are all gods children. That the things that seperate us (creed, color, national origin, socioeconomic status, religion, etc.) pale in comparison to the things that unite us (humanity, our shared home on this planet, our shared history and future as a species, the blessing of our being alive and sentient).
'Great States Junior' has been a favorite game of Kyan's for a couple of years now. He pretty much knows the game by heart and when we play he answers/finds our questions before we can;) Last week, he and I were playing it, and it asked a question about the Space Needle. Having my phone sitting beside me and not wanting to interrupt our game too much by going and getting on the computer to look it up, I looked it up on my smartphone. We read about where it was located, how tall it was and how much it weighed among other things. After that whenever we had a question that involved a states landmark we would look it up on my phone.
As well as general research and reminiscing we will have a theme at these sessions:
The Good: Do I really have to tell you that it does not end well? And this is only the first few chapters. It just gets worse from there... (or, actually, better, because this book is awesome and it is one of my favorite books of 2010, see sidebar).
I think I’ll stay out of the basement of that building for a good long time.
our Guest Spotlight for November & December has made a really cute Christmas Cheer greeting card using Rachael's Gingerbread Christmas...one of the digital stamps Inky carries.
When you click on it, it should take you to your OVERVIEW page that looks similar to this if you have the new interface.
‘I think so, yes,’ Petro said.
Ella Rose has been on my 'secret' list of models I want to work with for some time, and I had originally tried to book her for my Scotland trip in April. However I successfully made a booking for an art-nude shoot with her over the Bank Holiday weekend, with my two usual fellow photographers.
I think this is the third compact I've finished of this and I will for sure be ordering a fourth. It is a great setting powder and works amazingly well over BB creams and tinted moisturizer.
I did cheat since I wanted to get a handle of coloring it and not worry also about making it so I bought it from the COOP grocery store here. Which I am glad they now have things for decorating cakes. When I first moved here it was really bad and you left to a few choices as to what to put on the cake.
Mathematical theories:
IV. This Is Also What You Replace The Banal With.
Some ladies find it difficult to settle down in their husband’s home because their mothers didn’t teach them even how to cook. The mother didn’t teach them how to behave when they get to their husband’s house and so the future was even destroyed before they left home.
F.) USA
Now the vibration of that great energy field has been lifted higher. You have been prepared for this for the last fifty years and more preparation will be given to you in your future years. You are now learning to recognize and communicate with your Higher Self. You are learning to acknowledge what you feel inside about a situation, a person or event, or a personal under- taking. Your Higher Self is continually pushing forward now asking, “How do you feel about this, how do you feel about that? Does it feel right, does it feel good to you? Just how do you feel about this?”
My Asian dreams got wider geographically –through food as a touchstone. Thai food stoked the golden visions of the Royal Palace in Bangkok and skinny market boats floating down canals, loaded with fresh produce.
Personalized check-in & check-out
12 - The Greenhouse of Abject Horrors 1:43
some satisfaction with the day and
I am thankful...on my Facebook page, my thankful number eight is that I am thankful for my Father in Heaven who knows how to bring peace and comfort in the depths of our despair and confusion.
I don't dare presume I wouldn't be ten times more afraid and shell-shocked in the field of battle than the man who got slapped, or even Jeremy Davies in SAVING PRIVATE RYAN (1998). One can't know from a besotted armchair field position, but there are other ways to prove your courage, such as smuggling drugs out of Istanbul, or trying to score with the hottest chick in the room without any wingman or back-up, or bluffing your way past the velvet ropes at a hot nightclub, even just not drinking, one day at a time. In each case you can choke, or go with the whole "ain't no use cryin' - mom ain't comin'" thing, courage thing, which is important to bear in mind as the alienating effect of technology quietly mutates us back into children via unsupervised lengths of time in complete privacy, allowing the illusion of a mommy, the flat glass teat. If God had given us wings he'd expect us to fly, so in the age of internet, why not go all the way and abandon your body? If God hadn't meant us to leave our bodies he wouldn't have given us the internet. Needless to say, that kind of alone time is deprived our common foot soldier or tank brigadier. He was booted into manhood and had to stay there until he realized he liked it, and that could take years.
They walked on for a while in companionable silence, listening to the woods sounds. Ralph chased several squirrels, occasionally looking back to make sure Rachel had seen his bravery.
Colored Granulated Sugar
The grazing being of limited periods will not hurt the environment then the entire herding group moves on to return in a few years when the foliage would have regrown. Cattle remain healthy, lots of REAL high paying jobs as Cowboys, so those on cattle drives probably only will need to work 3 months a year. Much better than being a bean counter, pen pusher or paper shuffler or ‘programmer’ producing nothing in the real world right? The same way Facebook and Internet is just electricity without any place in reality compared to REAL work as suggested above . . .
I am very glad I embraced this challenge, as these colours are so much more fun to work with than I'd first thought. I am really pleased with this LO.
We regret to learn that while Mr. Thomas Shea, an industrious mechanic of our town, was in Philadelphia, last week, some one of the long fingered gentry who infest some portions of that city, succeeded in getting hold of his pocket book, and extracted therefrom the sum of two hundred dollars.
Or maybe it will be a picture of my crazy hair, attempted to be help back by headband. Stubborn flyaways sticking up behind said headband.
What will be our lembus bread and memories of the taste of strawberries? What will keep us going? Probably the Dave Ramsey Show, seeing the eventual tipping of the scales on principle to interest, as well as encouraging words from friends.
and is one of the first
For only £99 we provide everything you need including lunch and refreshments and only ask that you bring a paper trimmer and your favourite scissors, tweezers, etc.
The BSC provides the control functions and physical links between the MSC and BTS. It provides functions such as handover, cell configuration data and control of RF power levels in base transceiver stations. A number of BSCs are served by a MSC.
ASSEMBLE your sandwich makings. SLICE baguette lengthwise into two 6-inch sections, split each piece open and butter lightly. TOAST lightly under the broiler. SPREAD mayonnaise on bread, stuff with lettuce, tomatoes and pickle slices. Set aside while you PREPARE the oysters.
Lexi auditioned for and was accepted into a summer program at the Georgia Ballet so she will be dancing there for most of June, four days a week. This was an exciting step for her. After the summer program is over we will have some decisions to make about where she will dance this fall.
Absolutely fabulous was collection of young Andrea Bistričić who designed moder uniforms for men. Modern version of Scottish kilts, jackets with cool prints, dark colors and Dr.Martens. Models were tatooed guys with crowns of metal wire on their heads.
Inconsistent directions
Then, Nancy responded in a way to show her expertise, or her lack of expertise, by saying, “I am telling you Paul, – I do not see how it is going to jeopardize the investigation to tell ME who put her down. Then Nancy went into how she and her husband put the twins down – like the way they do it is how everyone else in America should put kids down. She said something like they both start putting them down and then he goes in another direction.
Needless to say, men thinking they can get away with their sexuallity and stature, you are shamelessly going to be embaraced in the eyes of that woman you tend to lack respect of. Causing her tears, you are digging your own grave, causing her massive of pain is the end of you as a man because ones she regains her strength its more of a mountain than your goddamn manhood can move.
Some festival goers came along to the big day especially to see The Control.
The life of the theatre, bar-room, huge hotel, for me!
I like to say that I have an over-developed sense of empathy; I'm not just really good at seeing the issues from all points of view, I sometimes trip myself up trying to explain things because I try to say things in a way that everybody will be okay with. That doesn't always work, I know, and often I'm having to backpedal my words. Oftentimes a lot of what I say ends up not making sense or I simply don't explain myself well enough, and when that happens I just quit the whole thing and I leave feeling frustrated. Good thing I have this blog, right??
I decided to date rather than number these as I don’t want to have to keep track of what number I’m on. Also since I occasionally write them on a day different than the one they are describing, it made sense to me.
and everyone I know and love will be fine,
Despite the ending it’s worth grabbing if your local used book store has it. It was made into a movie starring Doris Day, Louis Jordan and Barry Sullivan.
Olive oil, 1 table spoon
The sophisticated Gershwin track "They All Laughed."
I've used my new Gypsy for the lettering which is from Gypsy Font and the dragonflies are from Gypsy Wanderings.
A volunteer from “The Run for Home Haven Horse Rescue Ranch” responded and arranged for temporary feeding and care of the animals. Despite the efforts of the rescue volunteer, veterinarian and county responders, one horse had to be euthanized after a day’s effort to save the animal, the release stated.
Cholesterol: 32 mg
The plan, laid out in the fine print of Blackstone’s financial documents, comes as Congress debates how much managers at private equity firms like Blackstone and hedge funds should pay in taxes on their compensation.
I'll be back later this week to show you a couple of my inspiration photos for this little makeover....and my progress so far. You know....ripping carpet off stairs isn't as easy as I thought....I'm so gonna need a manicure after this.
Surf Coast Shire Mayor Brian McKiterick says its important owners register their cats.
I am starting to dress more my age and not like a 20 something anymore. I am now an adult.
-Donut Hole
Stevie Robinson – Vocals & Guitar, Antoine Swift – Bass
Just as importantly, the bullies themselves need to know they aren’t protected from punishment just because they fall back on the excuse of “boys will be boys”. They need to see the consequences.
I love my Nazi Cross. It was sent to me by a German Nazi friend who is an amazing 107 years old and has lived in Argentina since the 1940′s. It is rather slimming due to its large size. Don’t you think I look great?
We attract people that are reflections of ourselves. Like I said in my post about playing the victim, if you’re not being your own cheerleader you’re probably not going to attract someone who supports you like one. So how do you attract someone like that? How do you attract soul-mate-twin-flame-hot-lust-tangled-up-in-each-other love?
The Pan-Galactic Gargle Blaster from The Hitchhiker's Guide to the Galaxy by Douglas Adams
Yesterday, MC and former Fugee's member Wyclef Jean, a longtime activist for his native Haiti's on-going struggles spoke out about the recent tragedy that struck the island...
The economic collapse, WW3, earth and climate changes will destroy the agendas of virtually every individual, nation, country and organisation in the world.
Jesus died on the cross to take your place and to grant you His righteousness. Now, we have the fullness of Christ and it is only through commune and relationship with him that we have the ability to walk with Him.
Sometimes I still can’t believe how fortunate I’ve been. I couldn’t ask for a better life. I have the best parents in the world. And would you believe that I met my soul mate when I was only 11 years old? Moving to New York was the best thing that could have ever happened to me. You see, I met the most amazing girl. Only, she didn’t know just how amazing. I walked into a classroom in a new school, to see this sweet girl sitting there. She looked like she had lost her puppy. She had her head down and looked like she wished she was anywhere but that classroom. I sat next to her and said hi. She was so cute, she looked around to see if I was talking to her. From that day on we were never apart.
3 trait
Already Gone
There have always been short-cuts for certain people; your family knows some people in the business, you go through the grad scheme, you go to the right ad course and get introduced to some agency people. But what about the people who don't have that? The people whose families don't mix in the right circles, or who didn't go to university, or who took a circuitous route to realise they wanted to get into the ad-game?
and it also provides room for and the supplies needed
My analysts have recently completed a research report called Lombardi’s Secret Stock That Goes up When the Stock Market Goes Down. We have hundreds of hours invested in researching, compiling and writing this report. My company plans to sell this report for $95. You can get it for free.
Huhu, long time not update….anyway…i’m just finish watching this movie…its a good movie…sweet for a while but also not sweet lo…
Check back later this week for a look-see.
your wishes make everything cataclysmic
Me: AHHHH I can’t breathe. Why are you trying to kill me?
Nogne-O Imperial Stout -- very very good
You sauntered into the room
You can count on these highly valuable and deeply connecting conversations to be informative, controversial, empowering, world-expanding, perspective-shifting, and most of all, Completely Celebratory of this glorious path of radical unschooling.
Keegan Jask book 1, a collection of implausible tales from the stellar storyteller. Written by myself with help from artist Leigh Shepeherd It will be 100 pages+ and feature an all new, somewhat improbable tale and hopefully be on sale at the Bristol comics show in May!
He grimaced at the guilt pangs, ran his right hand over his face stubble and looked away.
Individual voters, not men or women, not Hispanics or younger voters, not blocks of voters that can be conveniently identified, but individuals who had listened to the debates, taken the measure of a large number of candidates, and concluded that Romney had the values, the character, and most importantly the experience and judgment to be the next President of the United States.
- Little Roast Beef
On the other hand, it is asserted with equal vehemence in the opposite camp that conditions are still far from normal; that the picture painted by the President in cheerful and reassuring colors is based on over optimism and, as to be expected, calculated to show in bold relief the achievements of the administration, and so should be considered with some allowance; that we are now importing more rice than before the war for the reason that many rice farms are idle because of the farmer’s fear of or interference by dissidents; that the problem of peace and order is far from solved as shown by the frequent hold-ups, kidnapping, loothing and killings and organized banditry not only in Luzon but also in the Visayas and Mindanao; that whereas before the war, the Constabulary force consisting of only about 6,000 officers and men could provide complete protection to life and property and was adequate in all respects to enforce peace and order, now this Constabulary enlarged to about 20,000 men, provided with modern weapons and equipment and with the aid of thousands of civilians guards and of the Philippine Army and Air Force cannot solve the peace and order problem; that the dissidents who are well organized, armed and disciplined even attack and sack towns and sometimes openly defy and engage the armed Government forces; that as long as more than 100,000 firearms are loose and in the hands of irresponsible parties, not excluding the seemingly regular mysterious supply to them of additional firearms and ammunitions, there can be no peace and order; and as to the barrio folks in central Luzon and now, even in provinces bordering central Luzon whose parents and relatives had been killed by dissidents, whose women folk had been outraged by the same elements, whose homes had been looted and burned and whose very lives had been subjected to constant terror and peril, compelling them to leave their homes and their farms and evacuate to and be concentrated in the poblaciones to live there in utter discomfort and privation, it is said that it would be difficult to convince these unfortunate people that normalcy has returned and that there is no longer any emergency resulting from the war. To further support the claim of the existence of an emergency, the menace of communism not only at home, particularly in central Luzon but from abroad, especially China, is invoked. And it is asserted that all this is a result of the war.
Yet, underneath this chaos, lies a crucial truth missed by many: Greece is undergoing a fundamental change in its political landscape.
~ Must have a US mailing address.
These breadsticks are wonderful for a tea-time snack, for breakfast and a light lunch. It is really tasty. I ate these plain with a cup of Earl Grey. When eaten freshly baked, the crust is crispy and the insides are soft and chewy.
Filled with video, puzzles, community collaboration, and more, "Go BZRK" put YOU the player right in the middle of the action as you join Nexus Humanus and unravel a mystery that may hold the key to the fate of all mankind.
I absolutely loved these books (and secretly hope I can be Mrs Nora Maura Margaret Mullarkey when I grow up). Bansi herself is feisty, engaging and brave - all things I require in a heroine - and the double act of Tam and Pogo charmed the socks off me and made me laugh. I'm ashamed to say that I didn't know much about Cluricauns, so Flooter was a bit of a revelation to me. I'm delighted that John chose this particular being to write about - one of the pleasures of this series for me is that it's turning out to be an education for me as well as my lovely blog readers. I will therefore pass you over to John to tell you about:
And sleep peacefully in your caring embrace.
